The big return of the Czech smoler is approaching.
Pavel Francouz was called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goalkeeper Pavel Francouz, who is going through a difficult period in his career, is returning to the NHL.
The 33-year-old native of Plzeň will be on the bench and soon he could also get into the goal.
The former Litvínov, Plzeň or Chelyabinsk goalkeeper was injured in preparation for the NHL in October last year.
He was exactly in the middle of the game with Vegas and has not appeared on the ice in the NHL since then.
The incident occurred when the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to another.
"Pavel Francouz will be out for approximately three to four weeks with an injury to his lower body," the Denver Nuggets announced at the beginning of October.
His return to the NHL lasted more than two months.
On Sunday morning, U.S. time, he was called from a farm where he had caught four ducks and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he had a save percentage of 94.5%.
The former Plzeň hockey player wants to finally make his mark and prove that he belongs in the best league in the world.
In the last season, he had problems with his knees and did not play a single match in the shortened pandemic season.
In the NHL, "The Frenchman" has played 36 games, with a save percentage of 92.3%.
Charles puts a wreath on Camille's head, William and Kate pose in Jordan
Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photo taken during their trip to Jordan as their Christmas card this year.
Prince Charles also posted a photo of his wife Camilla helping him to put on a hat as well.
The British news agency BBC reported on its website.
They send their wishes to their friends, colleagues and charities with which they work.
The photo was taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge is dressed in a long summer dress in khaki colour and the Princess Charlotte also has a dress in the same colour.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing the same shorts and polo shirt as Prince George and Prince Louis.
Who took the photograph, William and Kate didn't mention, is not even clear when exactly it was taken.
Last year, the royal family posed for a Christmas photo shoot in front of a pile of logs in their Norfolk country estate.
The heir to the throne, Prince Charles, and his wife, Camilla, also released a photograph to mark the occasion.
Photographer Sam Hussein captured the moment in June at Ascot.
Charles, who has a cylinder on his head and a veil on his face, helps Camille put on her coloured veil to match her white dress.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbatov a million for the title, but Tvrdík denied it.
Prague - Criminal investigators allegedly worked with the fact that the former vice president of the Czech Football Association, Roman Berbr, had been promised a million crowns by Slavia Prague for the league title in the 2018/19 season.
The server efotbal.cz reported that it obtained a part of the police records.
The president of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the red-and-whites did not commit any corruption.
The server published a transcript of police wiretaps in which Jan Nezmar, Slavia's former sports director, is mentioned mainly. Nezmar ended his career at the top club in the summer.
A former influential functionary of the Czech Red-Green coalition was in frequent contact with both Berber and Roman Rogoz, the former sports director of the second-division Vyšehrad, who is also among the accused in the case.
The police reportedly worked with information that Slavia Berbro promised a financial reward to anyone who would help them win the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Praha team won the first league title.
The police had knowledge that Roman (Berbr) had been promised a million-crown bonus by the SK Slavia Praha functionaries for winning the league, according to the server.
According to the criminalists, Berbr did not only meet with Nezmar, but also with the president of the board of directors of Slavia, Tvrdík.
According to the server, the police are still investigating the information.
He categorically denied any corruption.
In the years 2015-2017, we actively sought to change the situation in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We have never engaged in illegal conduct, we have not tried to influence referees in violation of fair play rules, and we have not provided any financial support in this regard," Tvrdík told Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar is not discriminating against some former Slavia players, and he is also insulting his former boss Tvrdík.
The case of alleged match-fixing through referees was launched by the police in mid-October in several places, including the Prague headquarters of the FAČR.
The highest-ranking person in the affair is Berbr, who is no longer involved in any football functions.
In mid-January, just like the former sports director of Vyšehrad, Rogoz was released from custody.
Helicopters, tanks and BVPs are Cold War LARPing.
The new ones will be worse, but they will be armoured cabins, and they will have to carry the shells by hand, without any protection.
The cars - Toyota HiLux - are new and good
The armoured vehicles and various armoured vehicles - at a decent level, moreover, we managed to get rid of the Praga V3S even from specialised units.
Planes: combat-worthy, but at the end of the lease, transportation - very small with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and mostly small, with little combat potential
Rockets - we have none (but we are making and exporting them)
PVO: middle - undergraduate, outdated; short-range - good, modern, relatively good number.
I have such a story.
I have a hunting lodge right next to the city.
The nutria were swimming in the river and causing damage to crops, so I was stationed there.
When I arrived, I saw that on the other side of the river there was a fisherman.
I didn't want to run a brothel, so I sat quietly and typed away. Maybe he didn't notice me.
I hoped he would leave before something happened, but of course, a mouse came out.
I let her come to 40 metres before I decided to shoot.
The poor fisherman nearly drowned, he was caught in a net on all sides, so I called out to him that it was on a mouse.
Before I got out of possession, I was fouled.
That is, a man's pride can be his downfall.
On the other hand, it's not a war, it would have to be a miracle of many coincidences for something to happen, probably you would have seen a thermal camera today, which almost everyone has.
So, to the visible place, drag the expensive things to the ground and you should be in comfort.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of Health paid significantly less for respirators than the Ministry of Health
The state responsible for purchasing and distributing masks, respirators and other protective equipment for the professions closest to the coronavirus has spent millions of crowns on their purchase in recent weeks.
iRozhlas compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that the amounts varied by hundreds of crowns within a single day.
Why did prices suddenly skyrocket?
Which agencies acted economically?
And why did others buy dráž?
Lenka Kabrhelová is talking to the editor of the iRozhlas server, Dominika Kubištová.
I value the soldiers and the army (I'm not affected by memories of the SLA, which older generations went through), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't have much in the way of technical skills that could be trained, we don't really have modern technology for our current professionals, and moreover, modern technology is always more complicated, so the skills of the reserves will rapidly erode over time.
Modern conventional conflicts, where anyone can be deployed, will happen very quickly, and there will be no time to train again.
And finally, reserve forces/territorial defence are of great importance for countries such as Ukraine, where it is necessary to wage a mass guerrilla war and it is also a stated necessity for the enemy to be removed.
In the Czech Republic, only a conflict of such a scale and intensity would make guerrilla warfare relevant, and we do not have the right geography for it.
We don't have individual skills.
It's not even the worst.
The worst thing is that half of them play as if they didn't have it.
Then there is the situation where you look like a joker who 2 minutes ago didn't manage to get through the empty gate, and then he rushes into the attack between 2 or even 3 Swiss, and you say to yourself "oh, and what do you think will happen now?"
Of course, they will take him as an average tax payer.
The situation with this skill "to provoke the defender" is so bad that I am surprised that our attacker managed to turn one of the opponent's players.
First butterflies
The Covid-19 pandemic is slowing, but experts are not expecting any major changes in the coming weeks.
Hospital pressure according to statistical models will continue for some time and has been added to the pandemic equation, as is known, a new unknown: the omikron variant, which is very likely to spread much faster than the currently dominant Delta.
At the same time, it cannot be said with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course, to what extent it is helped by vaccination or post-infection immunity gained from a previous illness.
But this week, an unexpected phenomenon appeared on the plus side of the COVID equation: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug, molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic, which reduces the risk of severe disease and hospitalization by a third and can be treated at home.
And soon it should also be supplemented by the drug paxlovid from the Pfizer company, which according to the current results has a success rate of 85 percent.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, however, beyond the hope of expanding the portfolio of tools useful in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, also highlighted the question of how the Czech administration is prepared for the arrival of the drugs.
As stated, the first to reach Czech patients will be molnupiravir from Merck.
The company finished first on the leaderboard because the drug had been in development for a long time before the current pandemic, with the aim of finding a suitable treatment for viral horse diseases in South America.
This research is often overlooked that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
They are generally less open and less willing to share their opinions.
On the other hand, Eastern Europeans, and especially Czechs, are used to saying "our noses have grown."
You can do a survey where you ask people if they like Muslims.
Most Czechs will tell you no without the umlauts.
On the West, they will tell you how much they love migration, how everyone should help and how we Czechs are a racist bunch.
And then they choose parties like AfD.
He is afraid of cancel culture, saying this in public means losing his job and facing a media lynching.
Then it looks good in surveys, the west is good, the east is bad.
But they will find out what people think.
Only in France, Le Pen and Zemmour, both with over 20%, according to a poll.
We even know that the objects are three and completely identical.
Identical because of the rotation of units so that soldiers don't have to learn where everything is again. All objects are the same.
One of them is the Atom Museum in Brdy, and the other two are abandoned.
The SSC did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory, either for security reasons or for the speed of deployment of warheads due to its western location.
Only the heads of the rockets were stored in the underground shelters (there are two in each yew), as it is said.
If it was necessary to use this weapon, a special unit arrived, which picked up the head and mounted it on some kind of support.
In addition, the remaining ones are in a deplorable state.
At the second grade of primary school, we had a classmate Cigán, we were together for 4 years.
He was in his element, making good tackles, often too much, but he was such a mascot.
He was with him every day, often went out and wanted to explain something, he was missing very little, he went regularly, he devoted himself to sports with us, he didn't steal food, he didn't steal phones, he walked in clean clothes.
He also went to school in the woods, made various squirrel nests, but was always in a good mood, perhaps never a troublemaker.
In the eighth or ninth grade, the siblings were enrolled in the same class, but in different grades.
Soon afterwards, the teacher was beaten up, often by the police, they threatened and harassed other students.
I personally sell things occasionally (old things, things I don't need, etc.) and I have sold to the Cigáns many times. They always had the money, they never tried to pull any tricks on me to raise the price, and our communication was always calm.
I even sold a car like this, a boy called me a month later saying he had already sold it to someone else.
I tell myself I'm not a racist, it doesn't matter if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or any other colour, as long as they behave like a decent human being (works, functions, doesn't hit women, normal behaviour).
But whoever comes, he stretches out his hand, he rents apartments and houses, he has no order around him, he causes problems... so it doesn't matter what color he is, but it will bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants if they come here, they start working, they learn our language (not necessarily, at least English), they respect our culture.
If you believe in Allah, that's fine with me as long as you respect my traditions and culture, I will respect yours.
The young woman died in a car accident on Prachatice
"The young woman suffered serious multiple injuries and despite resuscitation efforts, unfortunately, she died at the scene of her injuries," said Zuzana Fajtlová, a spokeswoman for the South Bohemian Rescue Service.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who took the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of a Peugeot car was probably driving from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov and in an unknown cause he drove into the opposite lane in a curve.
The Škoda Octavia ended up on the roof of a building after the crash, police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová said.
The young Peugeot driver suffered very serious injuries in the accident.
He suffered multiple injuries and was trapped in the car.
After being released, she had to receive acute pre-hospital care, and was then transported by air ambulance to the hospital in České Budějovice, where the rescuer Fajtlová confirmed the diagnosis.
She added that the man from the second car suffered a minor chest injury and was taken to hospital.
Packages from countries outside the EU are subject to new rules, customers often fail to provide information
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
He mainly collects cards.
"It could be tens of dollars, say from ten dollars up, where it still makes sense to import, especially from Japan where the post is often free," the collector explains.
Since October, ordering small parcels has become slightly more expensive, and now you must add VAT and the postal service must provide data for customs clearance.
He will receive an email saying that customs are expecting the package.
All you have to do is fill in the details of the consignor, and if the trader did not include VAT in the sale, the customs authority will deduct the VAT from the total amount of the consignment and shipping costs.
If the recipient does not arrange customs clearance himself, the carrier must also be added to the total amount.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I click one or two delete buttons, add two attachments, and I'm done.
For me, it's usually a five-minute question, says Neuheisl.
However, not all deliveries are successful.
Due to new customs regulations, the daily number of international letters received in Prague fell from 60,000 to 15,000.
In addition, the Czech Post is also concerned about the fact that people do not respond to requests to provide data that are needed to complete customs proceedings.
Currently, there are 30,000 parcels on the international post, which we need to process.
If people filled in all the information that is required and filled it in on time, we would be roughly halfway there, says Matyáš Vitík, a spokesperson for the Czech Post.
Inflation solution
See the titles for how you would propose a solution to the current inflation?
Currently, we are at 9.9% inflation and it is expected to continue to rise.
What should the state do, according to you, to slow down or compensate for this growth?
We see, for example, that the VAT rate on food and PHM has been reduced in Poland. Is this your way?
What do you think will happen, what is inevitable with what is coming?
Prices are rising faster than wages, and it is inevitable that people will not be able to afford basic things, especially energy.
How many did you get, for example, added (who is an employee)?
This year they added 2% in gross, which is a joke, but fortunately I have a similar income from my own business.
Why should convicted violent offenders be locked up for just six months?
The animal's head simply won't fit through the bars, so the court has sentenced it to six months in jail just so it can do it all over again as soon as it gets out.
Six months is nothing in comparison to the trauma that her/his victim will have for years to come, negatively affecting her/his sexual relationships and relationships in general.
And that's not to mention the fact that the victim of rape doesn't have to recover from it.
Will this dissuade potential future victims from coming forward?
Man from Hrob "set fire" to his girlfriend from Kostomlat
A man from Hrob unintentionally helped the police to ensure the arrest of his nationally sought-after girlfriend from Kostomlat, who was issued a warrant for her arrest.
He called her to him.
But he went ahead anyway.
First, he approached a passerby and made up a story that he had been robbed.
The guards arrived at the scene after being called to the emergency number and were amazed when the alleged "robbed" person told them he made it all up to get the guards to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to advise the guards on how to report to the Czech Police.
During the identity check, the police found out that the woman was on the list of wanted persons in a nationwide search, and an arrest warrant has been issued for her.
The case is being handled by the Czech Republic.
A direct question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
Personally, I think that we are no longer ethnically or culturally Slavs, but I would like to hear your opinion.
Of course, I agree with you, it's a shame that Churchill couldn't ensure the liberation of Prague USA :')
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's a bit of a question whether a rational human being can really believe in something just because it might potentially benefit them.
I would not personally consider such a case to be true faith.
I cannot agree with Pascal here, there are at least ten thousand different religions in the world, if you don't count the cults.
Which god or gods does one then have to choose from?
I would say it is quite likely that at least one of the thousands of religions contains at least one god who will punish you if you believe in a different god.
But in the tenth month the word of the Lord came to me, saying, "Jeremiah, what do you see?" And I said, "I see a rod of an almond tree." Then the Lord said to me, "You have seen well, for the rod of the almond tree is a symbol of the early rain, and the almonds are a sign of the spring rains that I will send you." And the word of the Lord came to me a second time, saying, "Jeremiah, what do you see?" And I said, "I see a pot boiling, facing north." Then the Lord said to me, "Out of the north disaster will break out on all the inhabitants of the land. For I am calling all the peoples of the kingdoms of the north, to pour out their wrath on Jerusalem and on all the cities of Judah. And my wrath shall rest upon this place and shall not be withdrawn, declares the Lord, because they have forsaken me and have worshiped Ashtoreth, the goddess of the Sidonians, Chemosh, the god of Moab, and the gods of the Ammonites."
So it would not have been a rational choice to believe in any god at all, rather than risk picking the wrong one out of thousands and sending me to hell or some other similar place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by placement in the reserve.
The Swiss model is similar.
X months of training (in different specializations, X months per specialization) under the supervision of professional coaches with practical experience.
If you do it well, you can get a professional offer.
All of the components of the AČR would benefit from something like this.
It could be done in cooperation with the University of Defence.
We can say this: The cooperation between the education sector and industry is constantly improving, companies are recruiting in schools and there is a certain overlap, where the workforce migrates from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process is ongoing, each of us is constantly learning something new, moving from one field to another, etc.
There should also be a similar blending between the civil and military sectors.
I see it as a way to build a relationship between citizens and the army, which is an institution that guarantees that we will never be invaded by Russians, Germans or Mongols.
It's funny how you think of NATO as something carved in stone, we have allies and they will defend us if there is an attack.
No, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no,
One election in the United States will turn their budget upside down and the entire NATO will go down the drain.
The English will exchange us for Russian rubles, the Germans will exchange us for Russian gas, and the Poles have already shown that they are willing to show their backs and take what they want.
The only thing that has consistently worked as a guarantor of independence is a well-armed army and a population that can control military technology of its time.
And today, every teenager can pilot a drone remotely, so what's the big deal?
We don't need border defences, that's today's joke, but a teenager with a remote-controlled device can figure it out.
How to survive a box-tsunami
You unwrap the gifts under the Christmas tree and suddenly you're overwhelmed with boxes and contents?
This "waste" is again being used by e-shops, which lack packaging materials.
This is why a map of businesses that accept your used boxes has been created.
And not just about Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That is why it is a shame to treat them as one-off waste.
Anyone can bring a cardboard box, plastic or paper filling into the participating business (the map project KAMsNIM.cz contains nearly 150 of them).
This will support small businesses, reduce the amount of waste created and also avoid overfilled blue containers.
The shops themselves are also welcoming the packaging shortages, as well as the saved money, as the cardboard price has increased by 50% over the last few years.
In addition, I am strengthening my brand by appealing to environmentally conscious customers.
One of such companies is TIERRA VERDE, a producer of eco-cosmetics and eco-drugs.
The bags and filling materials are delivered to Popůvek near Brno by individuals who collect them at home, but we also receive deliveries from companies with whom we have agreed on regular deliveries of cardboard boxes.
We will use everything we have to pack our e-shop's deliveries.
Individually and collectively, we are creating a more mindful world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
However, the www.KAMsNIM.cz application does not only show the collection points for packaging materials.
It serves as a receptacle if you need to get rid of anything (e.g. unwanted household items, expired medications, used tires, worn-out electronics, batteries, light bulbs, large-volume waste, etc.).
All the waste can end up in the right place, and reusable items can find their second home.
The total map of the project contains more than 100,000 such places.
"Over time, more and more collection points, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places are being added to it, which help to find a use for things that would otherwise become waste," says Miroslav Kubásek, one of the app's authors from the association Ukliďme Česko.
I think it's a shame that in today's world technology is so simple and dumbed down that children who use a computer or a phone play games on it, but they don't learn the basic computer skills.
Recently there has been a problem (mainly in English articles) that students at universities do not understand the principle of components on a computer.
Because, for example, Google Photos or Apple's photo apps or even mobile phones in general simply hide the underlying filesystem with folders and everything is laid out on one screen in the app.
Let them use the technique from childhood, but mainly let them learn something.
Let's write history seriously
Emmanuel Macron presented the priorities of the French presidency of the EU, which begins in January, and it was grand.
Macron spoke for an hour, during which he unveiled the logo of the presidency, called for the protection of Europeans - in the workplace and on the street - and mentioned so many actions that it is impossible to list them all in half a year.
But French politicians love it and so do the voters.
Macron's supporters are in agreement that he should move between the right and the left, but they agree that he should do so in Europe.
And in France, there will be new presidential elections in April.
The election calendar also affected the priorities of the parties.
The French leader also mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to provide the conditions for historians to do so.
Several commentators immediately criticized Macron for pro-European propaganda and rewriting history.
In fact, it's more about trying to rewrite history.
The far-right candidate for the French presidency, Éric Zemmour, is currently touring France with the thesis that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during World War II, was not so bad, and he is having great success with this with the French.
Let's take Macron's idea for one history textbook seriously and not look at what's happening in France.
Was it necessary?
Students in European countries learn history as a story of us versus them and never as a story of the whole.
The Spaniards, the French, the Czechs are learning who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have a well-informed cantor, they won't know the broader context of the event.
The film of the year is Quo vadis, Aida?
The Czech "Mice" did not win.
The story, which returns to the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for direction and best actress, Jasna Duričić.
At this year's Karlovy Vary festival, he held first place in the audience rankings.
The best actor in Berlin went to Anthony Hopkins for the film Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit, and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like having a cold or being sick for a couple of days. I didn't have much of an appetite to smoke either.
It was worse than regular flu.
I don't have a cough with the flu.
(Only my personal experience. I don't think it's like that for everyone)
Christmas book recommendations
The Christmas double issue, which will be released on December 20, will contain a traditional literary supplement.
And with it, cultural tips.
We're also adding this to the digital edition for you pre-order customers so you have plenty of time to order books as Christmas gifts.
The prose texts that follow the previous similar collection by Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another portion of the world observed and described with uncommon poetic insight, depth, and atmosphere.
In his second prose, photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of a small town and Czech society.
A story about returning to one's roots that turns out to be just an illusion.
The Czechist and the comparatist transfer the story of the Red Riding Hood into the background of a contemporary village.
Its brutality surpasses the popular version and escalates into a horror about emotional emptiness.
And that the journey back to instincts is shorter than a person is willing to accept
The author's last novel tells a less sentimental story of returning from exile than we have become accustomed to hearing.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to live together.
Trains will start running according to the new timetable, some operators will change
From Sunday, trains will start running according to the new timetable on the railway.
The biggest change is the change of train operators on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of Czech Railways, RegioJet began to operate.
For most lines, only the departure time will be adjusted, and the route may be slightly altered.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
The sale of tickets began already in the autumn.
Czech Railways plan to run an average of 6,783 passenger trains per day in the new timetable, with an average of 478 long-distance trains per day.
The trains will travel approximately 118 million kilometres during the new timetable.
The new timetable for domestic trains within the Czech Republic will also run to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company will introduce dozens of new trains with the new timetable.
The main news will be the InterJet trains, which will run on the Prague-Cheb line.
The train operator will introduce new trains on the northern Moravia and western Bohemia routes.
The transport company will also increase fares from next year by an average of 3.2 percent.
Railways take inflation into account in their tariffs every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the introduction of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The transport company will replace České dráhy after the Ministry of Transport's competition.
RegioJet will run 16 trains per day, eight in each direction.
The changes also affect long-distance connections between Prague and Brno, which will also stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín from Sunday.
Leo Express kept its 16 trains, two return trains to Slovakia and also the weekend connection to Krakow.
According to the spokesman Emil Sedlářík, the carrier tried to maintain as much as possible the same travel times of its long-distance trains even during the planned maintenance work.
The operation of Arriva trains and other operators should continue without major changes.
The operator will also change on some regional lines.
Passengers will also see changes, for example, on the Českolipská line, where instead of Czech Railways trains, Trilex trains from the German company Die Länderbahn will run from Mladá Boleslav through Česká Lípa to Rumburk.
Passengers will also be able to use the single fare on the rail network for a second year.
Just like the Czech Railways, their prices will increase by 3.2 percent due to inflation.
I disagree.
Do we learn to see things from the other side?
Everywhere we hear how much they fought for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to act, how they died.
In my life, I have never heard teaching from the perspective of the slave-owning side or from that time, no one defends it, only condemns it.
No one tells you in school that blacks often sold each other into slavery and that they were often the worst slave owners.
No one teaches you in school that the colonizers often bought land from the Indians, everywhere they will just tell you how brutally we, the Europeans, exterminated them, while we ourselves were exterminated long ago.
I have also spent some time in the United States, at schools both in the north and in the south.
I have not come across anyone who deliberately covers up facts, but I have heard that it is happening and I do not deny that it is a problem (for example, in Japan, WW2 war crimes are quite taboo).
My point was that history is not black and white and that we tend to look at it from a modern perspective without understanding.
History doesn't care about feelings, it's just what it is and I think it's a fatal error to judge without looking at things from the time.
On the other hand, we should learn from this and never repeat it.
By the way, when we are talking about the southern states, yes, the confederate flag and the famous slave owners are quite popular there, on the other hand, they did have some of their own successes, and it would be absurd to dismiss them.
And the North wasn't much better than it is today, people idealize it more than it deserves.
And a lot of people forget that not everyone in the South was a slave owner and there were a lot of things that they fought against.
I would not compare this to the Russians, they deliberately omit some facts, lie and manipulate, and our view of them does not exist (there was a video on YouTube from a TV show where someone was beaten up for talking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What was jaw-dropping about US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealization of communism, something their country had never experienced.
Overall, I think it was a shock to some universities, the students were too radicalised and the schools have supported them so many times.
And when I imagine that these people will be much older, it bothers me that this could be the voice of the majority, because there are a lot of young people in there and even in the ruling elite.
I think feminism has already achieved what it had and it's not about the same thing anymore, it's radicalized.
Currently, feminists are those who have nothing in common with him and ignore the basic biological fact, and this leads to radicalisation on both sides, often leading to opposition even to reasonable things.
The more radical someone is, the more they are heard.
At the end of the day, I haven't met anyone who has accused me of colonialism or slavery.
I met a bad geography teacher, but it was mutual :D
Not because I don't like it here, but because it's completely pointless to me.
I should be proud of something I couldn't do myself?
In addition, I consider the concept of nationality to be unnecessary from the point of view of personal identity.
If something ties me to people, the world, and shared experiences, it's not where I was born, but where I live now.
I'm not a believer, but I can tell you this: We have two Greek Catholic parishes, one Ukrainian and one Slovak.
The Slovak priest is a really nice guy, he preaches more about theology than politics, but he always manages to sneak in some comment about the coronavirus, everyone feels embarrassed.
And of course, the Czechoslovak Hussite Church is here.
Officially they are Protestants, but in reality they were born from the Catholic modernism and are actually Catholics without the Pope.
I know a lot of Catholics who go to the Hussite church because it's theologically similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická Street.
Otherwise, the Church of St. Michael on the Dominican Square belongs to the Dominicans and even on Sundays at 15:00 they celebrate Mass in Latin, just as they did before Vatican II.
The Bethlehem star is in the Czech Republic, the scouts brought it from Austria
Břeclav - the deflated bell in Bethlehem, where according to Christian tradition Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
The scouts did not go to Vienna this year either, but picked him up from their Austrian colleagues at the Reintal - Břeclav border crossing in the morning.
They also took it last year.
The Bethlehem light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we participate in every year, and I'm looking forward to it.
It's an honour for me to have been chosen, said Amálie Budíková, the scout.
Last year, the handover took place at the border crossing Mikulov-Drasenhofen, directly on the border bridge, but now it takes place at the Reintal-Břeclav border crossing on the parking lot.
However, he usually travels to Vienna by train.
Nothing changes in the delivery of the firecracker across the Czech Republic.
The scouts traditionally set off for Brno by train, where they hand over the Bethlehem star to the local bishop, Vojtěch Cikrle.
On Saturday, December 18, the scouts will take care of the subsequent delivery of light. They will travel on selected high-speed trains and personal trains.
They will take the light from the local scouts' stations or volunteers, who will then spread it across the Czech Republic, even to places where the railways do not go.
This year, the scouts must also follow the current measures to prevent the spread of the coronavirus.
It's the same as last year.
We recommend that courier teams and local event organisers wear masks, try to maintain social distancing, there should be as few of them as possible, not to sing with colleagues, just to behave in such a way that it is as safe as possible, said Zuzana Hrbková, spokesperson for the Bethlehem Light action.
The tradition of the Bethlehem light, which travels through Europe, was born in 1986 in Austria.
The goal is to spread the idea of peace, friendship and harmony at the same time as the flame of the candle.
The light of Bethlehem is a symbol of hope, a light that overcomes darkness.
In the Czech Republic, scouts and scouts have been working to spread the word for more than 30 years.
The action is backed by hundreds of volunteers, and the candles are also a symbol of apathy and human compassion.
All the latest news, including a list of places where people can go for a candle, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I don't have an economics degree, so I don't know the foundations of economics that confirm that subsidies are bad for the economy, but I don't think that the subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
The development of infrastructure, ecology (e.g. water retention), healthcare and education will use these funds properly, but I don't understand why these funds are being given to agriculture, industry and firms in general.
As mentioned - it produces unnecessary products and damages the free market and "natural life of the company".
I work in a factory where there are a million signs saying "XY financed/co-financed by project XY" and such a company is just artificially kept alive.
This is not support for a company that gives work to x people, this is hindering the development of the company, as this company is holding on and squeezing out orders/employees from other companies, which would be able to grow and be more productive after its demise.
Absolute agreement, it's terrifying.
Even a person who was born in the Internet age sometimes gets caught up in some trick or trap - especially advertising.
I think the internet ads don't bother me, but then I realize that I've been influenced by them - it's just so pervasive that you can't help but be affected by it.
For this reason, I support the radical voices in the European Parliament who currently want to ban programmatic (= targeted) advertising...
It's all a scam, in the words of a classic - I would ban those internet sites.
I feel that this virus has its roots in (but mainly in point 1):
1. "I will not believe anything that most people believe and that makes sense, I am not a sheep, but I would rather believe something that is less likely, it doesn't make sense, but it is important that I have my own original opinion on which I will insist that it is critical thinking."
2. "I won't believe everything the media says"
3. "I don't trust politicians"
Television is following the trend of Christmas films, this year there will be over 200 premieres
Los Angeles - TV stations and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen out of the Christmas movie trend, and this year they will present their viewers with a record number of more than two hundred.
The operator of the film database IMDb calculated it.
The genre of Christmas family and romantic films has been popular with the public in recent years and has significantly increased viewership, so more and more of these films are being produced.
This year, four times more Christmas films were made than in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, only included films with the word Christmas in their titles, so there will be many more Christmas films than that.
Movies that people traditionally associate with Christmas have been around for a long time.
In the Czech Republic, fairy tales are associated with this period, and globally popular films such as Home Alone, Love in the Sky, or the classic Christmas story Life is Beautiful from 1946.
But the right Christmas movie boom really started in 2009, when the American cable television network Hallmark launched a special film series, according to the BBC.
Her Advent project, Countdown to Christmas, then included four films and was very successful.
This station started to delight its viewers as early as 22 October and will present a total of 42 Christmas pictures.
Lifetime's rival network has 35 new Christmas-themed films on its schedule this year, and popular streaming platforms such as Netflix are also contributing to the total.
"In this magical period of the story, it doesn't matter so much what's going on in the background, what's important is that there are a lot of Christmas trees and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies (On Christmas Movies I'll Be Home).
"For the audience, it's a form of escape and a way to at least feel a little bit of calm in the midst of all the holiday craziness and the craziness of the world we've been living in," Gray added.
According to him, for example, Hallmark uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform but successful.
You have two people who fall in love, but then there's about half an hour before the end of the movie when there's some misunderstanding, but it's resolved and they fall in love.
That's kind of how it's been, and as long as all the movies look the same and have the same atmosphere, people will follow one after the other, adds Gray.
Mazepin had a positive test for COVID-19, he will not participate in the final race of F1.
Only 19 drivers will start the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin had a positive test for COVID-19 and will not race in the last race of the season.
Haas sends only one car to the track.
In the last race of the season, he was aiming for a better position from 20th place, which he had achieved in qualifying.
However, Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team will not participate in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He was tested positive for COVID-19.
Only 19 cars will start on the grid, with Mazepin's teammate Mick Schumacher starting from the last position and Max Verstappen starting from the first, who will face Lewis Hamilton in a direct battle for the title.
Mazepin is according to Haas' statement relatively well and does not show any signs of illness.
Nikita is physically fine as he was asymptomatic.
They are now in isolation and will be guided by the advice of public health authorities, with safety being the final priority for all involved," their representatives for formula1.com said.
Haas has not sent a replacement driver to the race, nor can it.
The substitute would have to complete a qualification or ride in another part of the weekend.
The first athlete is not affected by COVID-19.
Kimi Räikkönen, who just finished the season, had covid-19, last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton were tested positive.
They can also lock you up for this.
And everyone will be robbed, the boss said.
From the law's perspective, COVID-19 is a contagious disease.
So it's in the same group as HIV, tuberculosis, measles or typhoid.
§ 152 Spreading of infectious diseases
(1) Whoever intentionally causes or increases the risk of infection or spread of a contagious disease among people will be punished by deprivation of liberty for up to six months to three years, a ban on activity, or confiscation of property.
(2) The perpetrator will be punished with imprisonment for two to eight years.
c) fails to comply with an obligation arising from his employment, profession, position or function or imposed on him by law.
d) causes serious harm to health.
(3) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for three to ten years if the act referred to in paragraph 1 causes serious injury to health to at least two persons or death.
(4) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of five to twelve years if the act committed in accordance with paragraph 1 results in the death of at least two persons.
Quiz: Why failing companies often have women in charge and what your boss should never ask you
The gender pay gap, i.e. the difference in earnings between men and women, is one of the highest in the EU in the Czech Republic.
Which country has the biggest differences?
And in which age group and in which sector do women earn the least?
Test yourself on what you know about pay equity.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price of the most expensive jewel will amaze you!
It's a bit like a portable workshop, and the creator put in half a year's work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but little experience, at home we never wore suits," admits Liban, who spent 3,000 hours on his project over the past six months.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the Swarovski crystals were delivered by the company.
The silver stars were adorned with 150 diamonds.
"The basis is wool and cotton, but silk adds softness," praises the creator of his work, which he however does not recommend washing.
And it has one more twist.
"I'm completely out of my mind, I have to sell my sweater as soon as possible," admits Liban.
If it succeeds, it will set a world record.
The previous most expensive sweater sold five years ago was only 720,000 crowns.
If MZ is disconnected from reality or doesn't care - let it pour out the bad circle and replace it with a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would help its non-Russian part (which is under the influence of the fog).
I think it would clean up the social climate quite a bit.
It would also be better to clarify the channels of "brotherly aid from the Soviet Union" to some of our political parties and representatives.
Then people who choose should also have a clear idea of what their interests actually are.
I'm sorry, I don't own TikTok.
Many young people would suddenly realise that the sun was shining outside...
Trump directly encouraged the abuse of the accused, reaping what he sowed.
On the situation in the United States with the leading African-American reporter.
In the United States, new cases of police violence have emerged, this time during nationwide protests.
Demonstrations that followed the killing of George Floyd by a police officer during an arrest opened a debate about systemic racism, police work and cases of police brutality against black Americans.
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with one of the leading African-American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But what would that increase in funding mean?
The union is paying us in bonuses.
If it stops doing that, we won't have the money.
I really don't see how that would stop us from using the money for something else...
You can argue that the money from those grants could be used better, but that's a completely different discussion.
Is it really possible for a business to evade taxes?
Is it possible for a business to evade taxes?
After all, if some piece of meat goes through a veterinary inspection, it must be somewhere recorded and can't just disappear, can it?
Prazzdroj and Jelínek probably don't make special alcohol for the black market.
But they often don't give me a receipt or take it away and throw it away.
The government approved the deployment of up to 150 troops to help Poland.
Drone pilots, researchers and survey crews could be out as early as Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They will help their Polish colleagues with the border with Belarus and with the construction of the planned fence.
Poland officially requested NATO assistance in connection with the several months long Belarusian regime's actions, which invite citizens of the countries of the Middle East to cross the EU border with a false promise of an easy crossing.
British and Estonian soldiers are already operating in Polish territory.
Is the Omikron mutation spreading in southern Moravia?
Hygiene is investigating another case of a child from Adam's.
"Currently, we have another suspicion of this variant in another child from Adam's, from the nursery class.
There is no direct contact with previous cases from ZŠ Adamov," said Ciupek.
In the past week, six cases have been reported in the region.
"We are still awaiting official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - it is being carried out by the National Influenza and Respiratory Viruses Reference Laboratory of the State Health Institute in Prague," said the director.
She added that it was two nurses from the Faculty Hospital in Brno and two children of one of them, as well as two eleven-year-old students from ZŠ Adamov.
There is no connection between the cases in Brno and those of Adam.
Three of them have mild symptoms, four have an uncomplicated course.
No one with suspicion of Omikron travelled abroad
None of the individuals traveled abroad, nor did anyone from their families, and no one has been in contact with anyone who was abroad.
There is no connection to the water polo championship for any of the individuals mentioned, Ciupek said.
The chief hygienist, Pavla Svrčinová, previously stated that an international water polo tournament was being investigated, which was held in Brno a few weeks ago.
Players from South Africa and one Belgian player became ill after returning.
California will limit the sale of firearms.
He wants to act like Texas when it comes to abortion bans.
California Governor Gavin Newsom announced Saturday a plan to enact a ban on the sale and manufacture of certain firearms using a legal mechanism similar to one used by Texas in its controversial heartbeat abortion law.
People would then have a right to compensation if they sue anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons or homemade firearms in California.
Newsom's announcement came in response to a Friday ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court that left Texas' ban on abortions in place, though it goes against a 50-year-old precedent that established a right to abortion nationwide up to about 24 weeks of pregnancy.
However, the court is now not deciding on the constitutionality of the entire law, but on a technical issue that arises from the innovative construction of the measure.
The ban was therefore enforced in this case by the public, which prevented the usual judicial process from being used to attack it.
"I am disappointed by yesterday's (Thursday) Supreme Court decision to allow Texas' ban on most abortions to remain in place and largely support the Texas maneuver to protect its law," California's governor said.
"If states can now block the review of their laws by federal courts, then California will use this power to protect human life," Newsom continued.
His subordinates were said to have been instructed to work with the state parliament and the justice minister to come up with measures that would allow representatives of the public to enforce the ban on assault rifles and so-called ghost weapons.
These are homemade weapons that do not have serial numbers and can be used to circumvent regulations.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to sue for at least $10,000 (about 220,000 CZK) in damages and legal fees from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault weapons, parts for "ghost guns," or kits for their production in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these horrible weapons out of our streets is to create a threat of private lawsuits, then we should do exactly that," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the production and sale of some military-style weapons for a decade, but a federal judge there blocked the ban as unconstitutional in June.
If the state were to now actually reinstate the death penalty using the Texas model, the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissenting opinion warned against expanding the same legal mechanism to other states, would be confirmed.
However, the Supreme Court did not grant Texas complete immunity from judicial review and allowed abortion clinics to continue their lawsuits against certain officials in the southern state of the United States.
Each emergency vaccination has its public testing phase, where we gradually come to know what the vaccination schedule will look like and also improve the vaccines based on the results.
For example, Israel has already conducted a large study on the effects of four doses.
And according to these studies, a five-fold increase in antibodies occurs in most patients, which already has a long-term effect.
It will have its own vaccination schedule like any other vaccination, but it's too early to say.
Another fact is that a new vaccine based on inactivated virus is expected to come to the market soon, which according to the manufacturer's specifications promises up to 10 times greater efficacy.
Leave the amount of teaching to be determined.
But to re-evaluate CO is to learn.
Since the time of Marie-Thérèse, our civilization and technology have progressed somewhat, and learning phone books and writing textbooks into notebooks no longer makes much sense and is a waste of time.
In these things, it would be factually brutal to take away.
On the other hand, how many people will leave the base with some basic financial literacy?
And what other things will be absolutely necessary for life?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is any online service in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
We have Netbox at home and pay for the sports package Telly for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, it does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatened to stop payments to the EU budget
According to Ziobra, the European Commission would be acting in violation of the law if it used its new powers and because of the dispute over the legal status, it would stop paying money to Poland.
The committee has already postponed the approval of the Polish plan for drawing 36 billion euros from the EU Recovery Fund to support economies affected by the COVID-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to move on and use the mechanism to claw back EU funds from countries that flout the principle of the rule of law.
"Poland should respond to this EU bullying by vetoing all issues requiring unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarna Polska party, which has no votes in the Sejm, the lower house of parliament.
"Poland should also consider its obligations in the EU energy and climate policy, which leads to a sharp increase in energy prices," Ziobro added.
If the dispute continues, I will ask Poland to stop its contributions to the EU.
It would be justified given that the EU is unjustly denying us funds from the common budget, which we also contribute to, said the Polish minister.
His party's approach to the EU is more radical than that of the ruling party, Justice and Order.
According to the European Commission, the changes that have taken place in the Polish justice system under Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
According to Ziobra, Brussels is setting "impossible conditions because its goal is not a legal state, but a change of government in Poland."
Warsaw is facing a "political dictatorship imposed by intimidation and an attempt to overturn the democratic decision of millions of Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said Poland should be a member of such an EU, based on the partnership of sovereign states, and not on the government of the strongest and the Brussels bureaucracy, which is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never agree to such concessions to Brussels, which would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to the fact that Poland has the status of a colony," he said.
But to admit it... In Lidl, they have one type of cheese in four different places.
I've been nibbling on other things, I've had yoghurt a few times, I just needed cheese, Parmigiano Reggiano, after ten minutes at the milk bar I gave up and asked.
They had him, it's true, in that narrow sector, all the selected, less common and special cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If there's a sale, I won't even go to the market, I won't even smell it, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to the market, I won't go to
To Lidlu so that I can take a vacation.
And it doesn't bother me at all.
I've been watching for two years how they handle data like manure, and most of the anti-vaxxers are just a little bit outside the herd than most of the pro-vaxxers.
Rational discussions are taking place at an expert level, but extreme opinions are entering the public sphere.
They are constantly moving from one wall to another.
Binary thinking: Vaccines save us, vaccines are useless.
Everything banned, everything allowed.
Colorful cakes instead of robust analyses.
Comparing apples with pears.
That's what this state has and that's what we have.
But the data collection method is different in those two states, and no one is doing anything about it.
Fuj, so I'm relieved.
Sorry for the interruption and I hope you have a nice day.
I was punished as a child for swearing.
It was never about the stamps, it was mostly that I repeatedly refused to listen and got angry (I read instead of going to sleep, washed the dishes, etc.).
I have never been punished without warning, my mother always threatened that if I did it again, I would get a spanking (sometimes even after another "bumping" of the pot, she would just bring it out and set it down so I could see it).
Only after I repeatedly refused to listen did I get a few slaps on my bottom (through my clothes).
Personally, I think physical discipline (in a reasonable manner and degree) is beneficial because children react to it much more than to words.
I think the part with the warning is important, because it gives the child a way of deciding whether to listen and get something, or to go wrong and get punished.
I just needed to be warned that I should start listening.
Defense of the system
When the prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional judge Vojtěch Cepl answered a journalist's question in 1999 about what the Czech constitution means to him - whether it is a sacred document on which one swears and about which one learns in school, or rather an agreement that can be changed in case of need - he definitely leaned towards the first interpretation.
Once we agreed on democratic rules of our life, which also define who we are as a state and its citizens, and we are better able to deal with changes.
Imagine: some nations have even their own rules.
Just as Czechs love knedlíky with pork and cabbage, Vojtěch Cepl asked the question.
However, the opinion that the Czech Republic's Constitution needs to be changed is becoming more and more common among lawyers.
The year is being tested by situations that its creators (including Vojtěch Cepl) could not have foreseen, such as the direct election of the president.
However, Cepl was right in one thing.
What we know about such documents is that political interventions in their texts must be deliberate.
The institution needs to be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to coping with most of the crises that companies face across history.
The constitution is, among other things, a kind of code of conduct for politicians, setting out the rules of the game.
We are afraid that power will be abused against minorities or individuals, so we tie our policies to prohibitions.
However, constitutional texts also allow politicians to exercise their power.
Covid does not discriminate, several-month-old baby is fighting for life in FN Brno
While it is known that the coronavirus is milder in children, there are still severe cases that hospitals are dealing with mainly in recent times.
"We know that children are more vulnerable and affected less than adults, with 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said Petr Dominik, head of the Department of Pediatric Anesthesia and Resuscitation at the University Hospital Brno and the Faculty of Medicine of Masaryk University, to Novinky.
The course is much simpler, lighter, often without symptoms.
But they are children who are seriously ill with the coronavirus, and we see this especially in recent times," said Dominik.
According to the doctor, there are dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It takes place at a children's infectious disease clinic.
Very seriously ill children with coronavirus are now being admitted to the ARU for the first time in recent weeks.
Children with post-Covid syndromes have been admitted to the department according to the doctor's instructions throughout the year.
"Now we are seeing an increase in children with acute COVID-19 pneumonia, which means they have lung inflammation that requires them to be on a ventilator," he said, adding that the disease affects not only adults but also adolescents and several-month-old infants.
Children are also being admitted to hospitals due to the coronavirus.
"Currently, we have children of several months and adolescent age here," the chief physician said.
However, she is happy that the children's hospital in Brno has not yet recorded any deaths from the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children died in the Czech Republic on December 6th, aged 0 to 14 years.
According to Dominik, a psychologist is an integral part of cooperation in the children's hospital - not just on the coronavirus ward.
It also points out that just like in adults, vaccination also reduces the course of the disease in children and at the same time reduces the incidence of post-COVID syndrome.
"That is why we recommend the vaccination record for children as well," the doctor added.
In the quiet zone, you can only walk on marked paths.
But the quiet zones are not that big.
They can be seen on the tourist map on mapy.cz.
In general, in national parks outside the quiet zone, you can walk anywhere (but don't cross the fence into the meadow).
Skiing/cycling in the forest outside marked trails is not allowed anywhere unless you have an exemption (but of course it is not monitored so much outside national parks).
How does a conductor practice?
Music is playing in my head, Josef Kurfiřt laughs.
He is a wild boar from Liberec and originally played the part of a forest horn.
As a singer, he can sing practically the entire repertoire, and as a conductor, he not only works in the Liberec F. Šaldy Theatre, but also in Plzeň, in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
It collaborates with the Hradec Králové Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonošský symfonický orchestr.
China builds image of handling epidemic, authoritarian regime facing crisis better
Sinologist Jiříouš: China is building the impression of being able to handle the epidemic and that the authoritarian regime is better able to cope with the crisis.
China has launched a health and political offensive.
A few months ago, Beijing was criticized for not being able to stop the spread of the virus, which turned into a global pandemic.
Now the country is reporting zero new cases.
States including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment and Chinese doctors are helping in the fight against the coronavirus, for example in the worst-hit Italy.
How to interpret Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
He runs into a friend and says, "I don't want to eat a pig?"
I have it and it's great.
The wife is happy because she is feeding the grass, the car is cleaned with a hose, and the children play with him.
It's just a parade.
If you want to buy a sloth for 5000,- CZK.
Friend: Well, I'll take care of it, it'll be a pleasure...
After a while, they meet and the one who bought it complains: "What did you sell for a sloth?????"
The lawn is swaying, everywhere there are huge trees, the car is shaking, the children are fighting, and the wife wants to get a divorce.
The one who sold it says: you speak badly about the elephant, so you won't sell the elephant...
World events are controlled by the superpowers.
Although the principle of the equality of sovereign states exists, it is the great powers that determine the course of international events.
Europe can only become a great power if it works on its integration.
It currently functions at the economic and political level (in certain areas), but military integration is still lacking.
Personally, I think Europe is moving towards federalization.
It won't be for 10, 15 or 20 years.
But in the middle of the century, attitudes will change and it will work out.
I thought about it and it is possible.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so I may have made a mistake.
I just take the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units on the same level.
I'll give an example from another comment "Spanish orange and mandarin", where it's clear that both are from Spain, whereas in "Spanish fruit and mandarin" it's not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
Also, I base it on the fact that the sentence says "all American forces," including their weapons, and I know that American complexes are operated by Americans.
In other words, I expect that it is already included in the broader concept and there is no need to specify it for the American forces.
But again, just kidding :D
Whether it's true or not, it's an absurd request
An earthquake with a magnitude of five was recorded in Tokyo.
An earthquake of magnitude 5.0 struck the Japanese capital Tokyo and surrounding areas on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings shook in the capital, but no damage has been reported so far.
No tsunami warning was issued, Reuters reported.
Vicki Holland from Britain tortured the possum Milly
Terrifying footage shows the moment a terrified gorilla curled up in a toilet bowl before her heartless owner flushed her and laughed at her.
The Hollander also fed the rabbits carrots, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of its actual nutritional needs.
The magistrates in Gwent have now banned the keeping of animals for life, according to The Sun.
Experts in primate rehabilitation who are caring for Milly after her abuse have said they have never seen a more terrified astronaut.
Milly spent almost two years rehabilitating at Monkey World in Dorset and now plays happily with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The four-time mother admitted to two counts of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was sentenced to 12 weeks in prison, suspended for 12 months, at Newport Magistrates' Court.
Holland was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, a lifetime ban on keeping animals and must pay a total of 12,000 crowns in court costs.
The leader of the Small Monkeys team, Steph Sawyer, said: "Milly is fine, but the rehabilitation will continue."
Milly took some time to get used to people again.
She would crouch and hide before every person she met, and any loud sound or sudden movement would make her scream.
Opička refused to eat for a long time.
Now, when she has settled down and is happy with the male, she can still be startled by a new person's gaze.
The psychological scars from the abuse will stay with her forever, says Sawyer.
The abuse of Millie was exposed after police in Gwent found disturbing footage on a woman's phone during a drugs raid at her home.
In the footage, you can hear Milly swearing vulgarly.
In the next video, Holland offers the opossum cocaine and says, "Do you want cocaine?"
That's how I get my nails done.
In May, together with her partner Russell Cox (43), she admitted to having cocaine with the intention of selling it.
Cocaine was found in Kinder eggs hidden in her home for £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns).
Cox was subsequently sentenced to 30 months in prison and Holland received a suspended sentence of 20 months.
And what amazing concepts do you learn from that prehistoric three times over, when you boldly leap over the entire 20th century?
So you take the same things in the first grade as you do in the sixth grade?
And the whole thing is killing the idea of bifurcation, where no one, with the exception of a few, cares if you can do it or understand it.
The main thing is to write the test for 1 and then no one will care.
Run and ask people on the street if they can handle the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone has gone through it, and the absolute majority doesn't even scratch it and will tell you that they have absolutely nothing to do with it.
So what does this curve teach us?
I'm a big fan of general knowledge and the fact is that people don't want it and don't need it.
And at that moment, it's pointless and you'll never get it back.
It is partly learned for the many people who will need it.
But as for the fact that you don't need anything at the station here, I thought it was absolutely serious... ...because you don't need anything.
Moreover, we are getting closer to the time when not knowing them is a sign of being a punk.
(We probably share our communist past with these barbarians at our machines, but the price we pay for that is high.)
If journalists could count, then COVID-19 would probably never have reached these dimensions.
Wedding at first sight: The war between Kadri and Andrey continues!
That's the main reason why Switzerland can't leave Kadri right away," Andrea answered in her Instagram Stories to curious fans' questions, explaining why she decided to cut off all contact and even block Kadri on social media.
Kadri and Andreou have been at odds since the beginning of the experiment.
The main problem was that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea would move there, at least until he returned to the Czech Republic permanently.
But she flatly refused to do so.
And as can be seen, their relationship did not end in love, but rather grew into mutual disrespect and animosity.
It was a planned attack on you! Kadri's reaction to Andreino's accusation of lying, gambling and debt was to turn the tables on him.
Kadri's supposed sincerity is not liked even by his younger sister Linda, his ex-wife's ex-wife.
She decided to publicly defend her brother.
I don't usually talk about such things, and I don't talk about such things with my family either.
I don't want to stir up any pity.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and defame someone I love so much, I just can't take it!
I'm sorry I have to do this, but I would like to publicly thank my brother Kadri for making himself into a character and helping our family when we needed it the most, even though he was so young at the time.
I'm more annoyed when I have to read such false information, which is probably too far removed from the context.
I would like to ask everyone to know Kadri as I do, our friends and family, who stand in solidarity with Andrey's words.
I am so grateful for everything!
Of course people will believe what is written, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him and know the truth and know how it really was, she added.
The drunken thief climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You won't believe why.
Chao began his crime spree at a parking lot in a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to available information, one vehicle was stolen in the end, which was valued at around 330 Czech crowns.
He didn't think of anything better than to climb up to the 5th floor and open the window to enter the apartment.
He stole two bananas.
On one security camera, a person is seen walking away from the scene of the crime, eating a banana.
When the owner of the apartment woke up in the morning, he discovered that the bananas were not where they were supposed to be and called the police.
She then detained Chaa.
The man admitted to drinking alcohol on the day in question.
And since he needed money, he decided to rob.
The whole thing is still under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the 5th floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and is tied to the state of emergency.
When it is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law, however, limits the scope of business
That's not enough for you?
The right to assemble will be restricted, but not abolished.
Over 60 percent of voters turned out for Saturday's elections to the councils of four towns
The new councils were elected in the villages of Komňa in Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice in Mostecko, Nová Ves in Liberec and Rovná in Pelhřimovsko on Saturday.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the number stipulated by law or the elected councils split up.
A total of 99 candidates were vying for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
The processing of the results of Saturday's elections symbolically closes a relatively difficult but successful year for us.
Four new or repeated elections to municipal councils took place there, and especially the very watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies, stated the vice-president of the Czech Statistical Office, Eva Krumpová.
She reminded that due to the COVID-19 epidemic, the elections were more demanding in terms of equipment and personnel.
In Komni, Uherskohradišťsko, the Saturday elections were won by the Association of Independent Candidates, which received 27.76 percent of the votes and two seats in the seven-member council.
STAN's candidate received 24.84 percent of the votes, which also means two mandates.
Občané pro Komňu also won two council seats, with 18.52 percent of the vote.
The former mayor of the village, Jana Křižková, who is a member of the Private Citizens, has also returned to the council.
Komňané – independent candidates – achieved one mandate in the town council.
75.48 percent of eligible voters cast ballots.
The association Pro Rovnou won in the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov.
It received 50.50 percent of the votes, which means four of the seven seats.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 have also joined the municipal council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Lužičtí a Svinčiceové Association, led by Mayor Jindřich John, won the repeated elections in Lužice on Mostecko once again.
It received 56.73 percent of the votes and, like in 2018, has four mandates in the seven-member council.
The second candidate for the Obec pro lid party received 43.27 percent of the votes, and thus will have three representatives on the council.
76.7 percent of voters went to the polls.
The independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves won the election in Nová Ves in Liberec ahead of the ANO movement.
The association of independent candidates received 59.88 percent of the votes and thus obtained four seats in the seven-member municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the votes and strengthened its position in the 2018 regular elections, gaining one more seat and having three.
Turnout was 42.9 percent of eligible voters.
The State Election Commission will discuss the results of the election on Monday.
They will then be published in the Collection of Laws.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think all of this stuff that people are writing to you, you know, it's all good.
You're just playing a fool to have fun with someone.
If not, then it's sad.
I don't believe Christians are degenerates, nor do I hold such a view.
I even like a lot of church buildings from an aesthetic point of view (which was ultimately the point).
And it doesn't matter who you believe in.
On the other hand, I find it bothersome how much power the church had in the Middle Ages, how much money it spent, how it suppressed science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars it has caused, such as the Thirty-Year War.
Tl;dr: Believe in the mushroom cloud, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell headfirst from twelve metres.
The impact on the concrete survived.
The incredible fall survived a man in Ostrava on Sunday night, who was rescued by the regional emergency services.
Workers at the regional emergency call center took over the call at half past midnight with initial information about the fall of a man from a height.
Two ZZS crews immediately left for the scene – a medical and a nursing crew.
After arriving at the scene, doctors discovered that the 28-year-old man had fallen from a height of around 12 metres and landed on his head on concrete!
Coal was mined in Vítkovice.
But not as it should, and firefighters went in.
When the rescue teams arrived, the man was unconscious with multiple injuries and in immediate danger of death.
The attending physician intubated his airways, provided artificial ventilation and transported him in an ambulance to the trauma center of the Ostrava Health Service, informed the spokesperson of the Moravian-Silesian Region, Lukáš Humpl.
I have greater concerns than the coronavirus, about inadequate public and government responses
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic means a challenge for politicians and officials, but in the first line of defense against infection stands primarily doctors and medical personnel.
How serious is the situation from their perspective?
We ask military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek Reserše: Tomáš Roček, zvukový mistr: David Kaiser, hudba: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes falls after seven years, Oliveira retains belt
MMA had a great night full of exciting results.
Things were happening at UFC 269.
The outsider, Julianna Peña, managed to defeat the legendary fighter Amanda Nunes, who had not been defeated for seven years.
Charles Oliveira did not hesitate in the lightweight division, he demonstrated a great submission against Dustin Poirier and defended the belt.
Kai Kara-France also won, knocking out Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated Sean O'Malley.
A surprise no one expected.
He brought a women's bantamweight fight between the legendary Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña.
The American entered the mutual battle as a "dwarf," as Nunes had not lost in seven years and was sharpening her teeth for another victory.
The beginning of the duel was also marked by the spirit of paper promises.
Nunes started the fight very aggressively and even landed a push kick that sent her opponent to the ground.
However, the pen was not deterred and tried to attack again using its pencil on her hand.
The second round was thrilling and very exciting for MMA fans.
Both women exchanged a lot of great punches and hard hooks.
Nunes was also knocked to the ground, where she began to writhe in pain.
She had to fight back and fend off the attack.
The American woman caused a huge shock when she became the new champion.
The highlight of the night was the battle between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier for the lightweight title.
At first, Poirier was doing well, but the cards started to turn against him.
In the second, Oliveira tried to be more active, trying to punch the opponent's arm.
It didn't work out for him, but afterwards he created a lot of pressure, got his opponent on the ropes and knocked him out with a series of punches.
Thanks to this, he won the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to tap out.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next fight, Sean O'Malley scored a dominant victory over Raulian Paiva, who was knocked out in the first round with a hard right.
He then received a series of precise blows and recorded his fifteenth victory.
Kara-France then had to deal with Cody Garbrandt.
In the spring, Nunes celebrated another triumph with her little daughter, now she has lost after seven years.
That knee, or that knee?
At first glance, it doesn't seem like anything complicated.
Most of the significant names in Czech express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether they are masculine, feminine or neuter.
There is also a relatively large group of substantive names where the gender is not fixed.
Such significant names are in flux between the two genders.
When inflected, they become double and in some cases remain in an uninflected form.
For example, the words "svízel" and "kyčel" are masculine and feminine, in the first one they are declined according to the pattern "stroj", in the second according to the pattern "píseň".
In another group of nouns, there are different forms in the singular first person, for example: "line/lines", "pot/pots" or "carrot/carrots" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are correct, have the same meaning, and are therefore freely interchangeable.
Some expressions may vary regionally, for example "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, in this case the Moravian variant is ungrammatical, as are other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih" and so on.
Some words that have entered Czech from other languages were originally unaccented, but they are gradually acquiring Czech endings.
A typical example is the expression "image", which is both masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet", which has remained in the middle gender and has masculine endings according to the model "fort".
Turkey has opened the way for migrants to Europe.
What is the situation like directly on the Greek border?
Tension is growing at the Greek-Turkish border as an increasing number of migrants attempt to move further into Europe.
Thousands of people have started to leave the southern border of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped protecting them.
European politicians promise Greece support, and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What drives refugees to take this uncertain journey?
And what is the situation like on the ground?
For three months we haven't seen blue sky and we've been suffocating, says a journalist from Sydney
Deadly bushfires have killed almost 30 people and hundreds of millions of animals and destroyed millions of hectares of land in Australia for the fourth month in a row.
How are the authorities and the local residents coping with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to avoid the drastic impacts critics say it has caused?
And what will the country have to prepare for in the future in relation to climate change?
Lenka Kabrhellová is talking to a journalist from Sydney, Ika Detrichová.
False accusations have always been rare.
That is why it is always written about everywhere.
For people, it is unpleasant to deal with how sexual violence looks like in our society and how widespread it is, and they try to cover it up.
I don't personally know anyone who has been falsely accused.
I know a lot of people who have been raped, and I've seen how the people around them, or even the police, treat them.
The victims should always be believed.
The trend has been that victims are finally opening up about their trauma.
But it's not something that a lot of people can afford to do for themselves.
Yes, there are those who falsely accuse others.
It's disgusting and patronising to all victims of sexual abuse, but by spreading the idea that "most of the accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" you're only helping the abusers.
Czech Republic is flooded with unfinished houses, families have no money to finish
Building material prices have risen more than 30 percent in the last few weeks and months.
Several people found themselves in a precarious situation.
She doesn't have the means to complete the family homes she has started building and the banks are refusing to increase her mortgage.
In addition to the cost of materials, construction work is also becoming more expensive.
Therefore, people do not have enough money to complete the construction of the already started family homes.
In many cases, banks refuse to increase mortgage loans, which creates extremely unpleasant situations.
In the best case scenario, people move into newly built and unfinished houses.
In the worst case, the built homes become uninhabitable and families are forced to sell them because they can't afford to pay the mortgage and the rent," says economist BHS, Štěpán Křeček.
We are planning to build two to three family homes this year, and so far, fifty percent of our projects have been successful.
For us as a construction company, it is difficult to comply with some things in the contract, even though the materials have increased in price.
So we're doing it without profit," said Zdeněk Slivoň, the owner of a construction company.
Many people will only have financial problems.
If they had calculated that the construction of the house would cost five million, now it will cost seven.
I think some will wait," Slivoň added.
The most expensive material was copper, iron, and also the installation and heating equipment.
But construction companies are also struggling with a shortage of workers.
There are shortages of graduates in construction trades in the Czech Republic, and the influx of foreign workers is slowing down the pandemic.
The situation with the issuance of building permits is currently more favourable.
"Building authorities issued 7,675 building permits in October, which is almost 10 percent more than last year," Křeček explained.
We are doing well and we will do even better.
However, the real vision is missing, says the commentator ČRO - mujRozhlas
The entry into the new year has traditionally been accompanied by political speeches.
This year, besides the prime minister and the chairman of ANO Andrej Babiš, the president of the Czech Republic Miloš Zeman also spoke to the nation, as well as the chairman of the Senate and the chairman of the Chamber of Deputies.
What have we learned?
Like in my opinion, the diploma is super, I have my own topic, which I chose, I'm continuing my bachelor's thesis, I always do it for a whole year and then in a week or two I write the written part.
The state officials are completely at ease with us, unless a person is a total macaque and something is left in his head, then the commission will not unnecessarily suffocate the theory.
I had to study for the state exam for a week and when I was at the end, the commission always tried to lead me to some logical deduction that I immediately understood and I was right.
Otherwise, to those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project for them (we did it a lot, it was really useful, a lot of learning) and then they just learn the project and have it done.
I think it's great when at the end of a subject there is an exam that reflects the knowledge gained during the project, not just the defence.
But I won't be sending emails or making phone calls, and I won't be sending any packages to the embassy.
You will be the same as they are.
Those people at the embassy have nothing to do with those people at the consulate.
And if they were against Russia, they would risk a lot, so they might have to play with them, otherwise something could happen to them.
But you can also put a similar statue of Putin next to the statue of the bear Pú.
Třebas should give it to Xi Jinping so that he can lick his ass or something.
I agree, despite the fact that Insta is throwing artists under the bus.
Once you stop reading stories and at least every other day a new picture, your impact will drop to absolute minimum.
In addition, it changes what is more important for the function, whether it is likes, comments or saves.
I've been really scared lately, so I might have to cut back on TikTok, where a lot of artists from my scene are having success and it's almost impossible to compete with.
Ultimately, I would be happy if something user-friendly came along that didn't drain all the creativity and energy out of the artists.
Statement of the Labour Party on Donbass
The Union - yes, the collapse - no, they express their opinion on the collapse of the USSR in the picture.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the USSR.
On December 8, 1991, the largest geopolitical catastrophe in the history of mankind took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the referendum on March 17, 1991, with an open-minded attitude towards Mikhail S. Gorbachev, secretly, without regard for the people, signed an agreement that "the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality no longer exists."
One stroke of the pen "erased" a huge country with almost three million inhabitants.
Tens of millions of ethnically Russian citizens found themselves abroad as a result of the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Since the beginning of the 1990s, the population of Russia has decreased by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the Nerushe population, we have already lost more people than in two world wars combined!
Earlier, the same people who destroyed what had been built over the previous seventy years in the Belovezhsky Forest betrayed the socialist camp (created by the cost of millions of lives in the Second World War and the Great Patriotic War).
Consciously they deindustrialized, slowed down agriculture, detached 14 republics from the largest world power, which were previously economically linked in a single mechanism.
If we look deeper, we see the impoverishment of the population, the breakdown of the economy, science, the army, the rise of crime, ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, the orange revolutions, NATO expansion to the east, the war and the breakup of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria - all of this is the result of the geopolitical capitulation, of giving up first the socialist camp, and then the Soviet Union.
There is such a concept in political science as "vacuum of power".
Everything that was rushed and given away was quickly filled and taken by NATO countries that accepted our geopolitical surrender.
The whole world is still shaken up mainly by events from the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a supermarket with a high turnover may not directly correspond to its quality and quality.
It's Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket that costs 189 Kč / kg.
I'll buy it, I'll put it in the freezer and I'll make it into a dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, where I don't buy meat on a Wednesday, the chain will reduce the price to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - explain to me the mechanism by which this meat will become an obstacle to my digestive system?
Or I'll wait until Thursday and the meat will cost 69 CZK/kg, which is different from the meat I bought for 120 CZK/kg and left in my freezer for 3 days?
I will answer myself - nothing.
These people who say that when something is cheap, it must be guaranteed to be bad, broken or of poor quality are horrendously retarded to tell you the truth ;-)
I recently went to Hlavas in Brno and a lady was handing out some brochures. I always take something like this with me to help the volunteers get rid of it.
No, the brochure was full of rural wisdom and conservative views on the workings of the world, but nowhere did it mention God, I was confused, but I knew it would be some kind of propaganda.
After reading it, I found out who was publishing it and eventually it turned into Scientology.
No, because he was a good matroš, full of all sorts of useless tips, as I am mýt and not be pičus.
The paper would save the rainforests from being cut down.
I have been through something similar with a former girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will make you do what that person wants you to do, even though you don't realize how much you are in the grip of that situation.
She threatened me a few times for going out with a cameraman she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she spread her legs and begged me not to go anywhere.
Then she started physically blocking the doors.
For a year it was a great relationship, but then it went downhill for another half year and then it started to fall apart.
Then I ended the relationship with her because I told her that we were breaking up and she lied to me but I can still talk about it next week to calm her down and not let her get mad.
Such a person drains you of your city, your emotions, and your overall happiness.
Prefer to keep a distance
When insurance companies are fiercely competing to buy test kits and hunt for positives, who would have known about the deadly disease without the test?
The only thing we achieve is complications for companies, transport companies and others, because their employees in the random number generator received five days of home detention.
On the west, they have stopped and recognized that it is not worth trying to treat a disease weaker than the famous flu.
Unfortunately, Válek is new and still needs to grow and feed his ego by inventing buzzwords.
I'm looking forward to the return of the old reliable shmejd.
After several years of decline and suppression of this illegal business, MLM recruiting is once again on the rise.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20, a top student at university), the initial promises of training in products and business skills quickly turned into "you don't need to worry about that, just sell people."
I was genuinely interested in the products I was offering because I wanted to help people, but the training was more on how to scare and amuse people.
When the first earned money came in, people quickly realized that if they wanted to make money, they had to churn out a few certain products every month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only sources of income, so people felt like they were just selling pots and pans.
What can I say, the experience was valuable, the person learned that you can't jump on every opportunity and that you need to verify information thoroughly.
I would not put all the pieces into one box.
People in this business are successful and even beneficial to people, but they certainly won't be praised for their expensive consumer goods or "thick" accounts.
In the company where I work, I haven't done anything like that.
HR is in peace, managers are looking at their management and do not interfere with anything.
So the regular evaluation does take place, in the form that it does here, it's quite good (set some goals for the next year, at the end of the year we look at what came out and what didn't) - it's more self-evaluation than someone evaluating you based on some numbers, and so on.
Company actions are also non-mandatory.
But we are also a bit unique within our company - we have departments that are more "corporate".
Sometimes you feel like you're almost a startup squatting in a big corporation's office.
But it doesn't really bother us too much until the results come in.
The Czech woman who was missing in Britain has died.
Her body was found in London.
Nearly a week after the disappearance of a 32-year-old Czech woman, British police are still searching for her.
On Sunday, December 12, the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that a woman from Uherské Hradiště was found dead.
British police today confirmed to our office in London that they have found the body of the Czech citizen who went missing.
The cause of death is being investigated.
We will not release more information about the case due to the family's request.
Kulhánek tweeted with sincerity.
The young woman was last seen on November 28th on a bus on her way home from work, before she had to pick up her money from an ATM.
Her disappearance was reported by colleagues five days later.
After that, the London police started looking for her, and Interpol added her to the list of the world's most wanted.
It has also been found in the Czech database of missing people.
Police have already detained one man in connection with the incident.
What role he played and what he suspects but did not reveal.
New councils were elected in four towns at the end of the year
On Saturday, 11 December, new councils were elected in the villages of Komňa in the Uherskohradišťsko region, Lužice in the Mostecká region, Nová Ves in the Liberecká region and Rovná in the Pelhřimovská region.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the number set by law or the elected councils split up.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates were running for 28 mandates.
Turnout reached 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters voted.
The mandate was won by a total of 8 women and 20 men.
The average age of elected officials is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the new elections to the councils of the four villages.
36 women and 63 men applied for the 28 council seats.
The average age of the candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22 years old, the oldest 72 years old.
The processing of the results of the Saturday elections symbolically closes a relatively difficult but successful year for us.
Four new or repeated elections to municipal councils took place there, and the very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies.
We had to work in more demanding epidemic conditions, which put greater demands on equipment and personnel security, said Eva Krumpová, 1st vice-president of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last precinct was processed on Sunday, December 12, at 3:49 a.m.
The State Election Commission will discuss the results on Monday and after approval, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
I had to come to terms with the fact that we have a very dangerous contagious disease, and it took me a while to get used to it, but it didn't cause any major problems.
I have a problem with the fact that a large part of the population, at all levels, is acting like idiots when it comes to this.
I am most looking forward to getting vaccinated (tomorrow!) because of that I will finally be less dependent on the fact that other people are not stupid.
He would be stripped of his presidency and his ability to regain it.
However, the chances of it actually happening are pretty slim.
In addition, I am not sure whether the cartography of the spider's web could be considered treason.
Velezrada is such a crime that the president of the republic threatens the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It must have been something more serious.
How the pandemic has affected intimacy: The number of people aged 35 and under who have never had sex in a year is rising
More and more young adults in the United States are living their lives without sex.
It is mainly made up of people who are religiously motivated, according to the Daily Mail's website.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the proportion of people aged 35 and under who have given up sex rose from eight to 21 percent.
Women aged 18 to 35 who said they did not have sex in the last year are more than ever before.
Other factors are also contributing to the decline in the number of sexually active individuals, the Institute for Family Studies (IFS) has found.
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus and higher unemployment rates.
But the presence of media, social networks or video games could also make sex a lesser and lesser priority for young people.
"Since 2010, the share of men and women aged 18 to 35 who report not having sex in the previous year has been rapidly increasing," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
Among people in marriage, sexual activity is more common, with only 5% saying they were celibate for the last year.
Among the free people, it was 29%. Stone added that marriage under 35 is only a small percentage.
The lack of sexual activity is also due to the fear of premarital sex and religious upbringing.
Despite the fact that married couples are more likely to be sexually active, the percentage of married and cohabiting women aged 35 and under continues to fall.
Young people's views on pre-marital sex are divided, with about 30% saying it's a bad thing, while about 70% think it's okay.
"It's true that in this age group there is a minority, but their behavior is pushing this trend," Stone says of the 30 percent.
For most of those with a moral problem with premarital sex, the reason is religious.
Since 2008, among people aged 35 or younger who attend religious gatherings more than once a month, the abstinence rate has increased from 20 to almost 60 percent.
The trend has risen from 10 to 20 percent among the "less religious," Stone said.
Other factors contributing to the decline in sexual activity include less social interaction and more social drinking during the pandemic.
The study also showed that the likelihood of sex is lower for people without work or with lower incomes.
Another reason may be the expansion of digital media, which apparently reduces the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "replacing" this need.
This trend has been on the rise since the lockdown during the COVID-19 pandemic.
The whole mandate for COVID-19 vaccinations is about whether society should force a part of the population to behave in a way that they don't want, but which could save their lives.
It's a pretty heavy question, and one I'm personally most interested in the question of social conscience.
That is, if we don't do it and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could certainly have saved the life of an 80-year-old man who didn't really know much about it, we didn't explain it well to him, he heard some disinformation, and as a result, he didn't get vaccinated and ended up dying.
On the other hand, I don't think we can blame the death of a vaccine opponent, who is being persecuted by the SPD and the KSČ, for something about the persecution and totalitarian state.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of the unvaccinated pensioners probably belong to the second group, so they will have to pay for it themselves.
The Czech Republic without snow.
How will mild winter help in the fight against drought?
This winter has so far brought one of the smallest snowfalls in recent years to the Czech Republic.
Ski resort operators will not be able to do without technical snow, the weather complicates even the preparation of the Jizerské padesátka race.
Is it a trend or an exception?
And what will a lack of snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it's not about a pancake.
One day our teacher took us across the whole city to the shipyard so we could sail on the boats on the river.
We walked down one of those wide streets, and we didn't see anyone in the middle - Hare Krishna devotees.
Of course, they hit us.
I was lucky to escape, but with one friend we got into a fight.
When she left, we asked her what she said to them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I didn't have a soul," she said.
All of us, including the teacher, made it all the way to the shipyard without a whimper.
We are so messed up.
It's not much, but the system is breaking down, says Orozovič
The new German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted by Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki with military honors.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the talks.
Scholz stressed that Europe must show together that it will not accept the violation of Ukraine's territorial integrity.
The crisis caused by the disturbing movements of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border is to be resolved with the help of diplomatic efforts, even within the framework of the "Normandy group", which brings together France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said that he informed the chancellor about the situation at the Polish border with Belarus, where its leader Alexander Lukashenko deliberately created a migration crisis and uses people as living targets and weapons, as we see hundreds of attempts to (illegally) cross the border every night.
He was negotiating with the chancellor about further sanctions to make it clear to the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin that we are determined to defend the eastern border of the EU.
According to the DPA agency, Scholz assured that Warsaw is benefiting from German support in its dispute with Belarus, and condemned the inhumane treatment of Lukashenko's regime towards the opposition.
Drunken Polish nun caused accident, tried to cover it up
The car returned to the scene of the accident after a while, but the driver was being driven by another nun who was trying to take the blame for herself.
When the police told her that she could still get a driving license even if she didn't show up for the test and drove away from the accident scene, she went public with the truth, TVN24 reported.
She admitted that she had hit another nun who had asked for help.
The police then came to see Celestin's sister.
They subjected her to a breathalyzer test and after discovering that she had over two percent alcohol in her system, they immediately took her driver's license away.
She also announced that she would confess to her actions in court.
Hugo is doing what he can.
Juraj Šajmovič, however, did not overlook his film.
Czech filmmakers looked at American stories about dog lovers.
But they forgot an important thing: the laws of film craft.
After the kitschy film F. Brabce Gump - the dog who taught people to live - now another film Tady hlídáme my competes for box office success.
The co-author of the screenplay and the director in one person, Juraj Šajmovič Jr., freely continues his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking goose Hugo returns to the stage along with some familiar faces around him.
Julie and Ivan, the owners of a pension in Šumava, which is on the verge of closing, will start calling cat catchers, Julie's father and his partner, and especially her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a young woman who is experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer) had problems with the storytelling in the previous film, but at least the children and the dog were entertaining.
This time, the creative duo has written a weaker script, which evokes a mixture of fear and feelings of dread.
Let's summarize.
Although Julie is a scientist, she is subject to the siren call of motherhood and, if the "constellation" is right, she copulates with her forest engineer Ivan wherever the coordinates precisely determine - on the hood of a car or the tower of a church (of course, during an excursion with a local guide), retired colonel Mojmír, despite his advanced training, shoots his own daughter (Julie) in the forest, who falls into a coma, after which the family takes her to the hospital, so that a miraculous healing process can take place in the heart of the Bohemian forest with the help of a dog.
Nothing against the healing power of nature and the strength of animal lovers.
Their owners know why they have them.
The viewer gasps as to how much content is packed into this message, full of dodgy situations and figures.
A pair of staff thieves, a pigeon racing competition, a Šumava charlatan, police officers arriving on a search for "drugs" and discussing over herbs about the strength of bone marrow - and of course, the well-cooked family in the pension drinks it.
When the heroine wakes up from a hard-fought coma and sits down on a sofa with a cigarette and a flapjack as a recovered vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
The creators will also explain to the audience that "this sometimes happens after a coma."
The Šajmovič team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with text, the ability to build a plot, a sense of character and point of view, and directing.
The acting is uneven, the editing is disjointed, and the overall impression is bland.
While Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková and Nela Boudová try to keep their parties afloat, they have little to play with.
The only claim to fame of the film is the poetic footage of the Šumava countryside by cameraman Vladimír Holomka and the pair of deer.
It is not enough to draw a few characters, a plot that is easy to follow, and dog barks, let alone the vulgar expressions that the characters use.
The argument is not that she has been a member of the Llama Breeders' Club - as in the case of the producer's wife.
For good intentions to promote nature and friendship with dogs, one must also have knowledge of the craft, if one wants to tell a believable story.
In this case, it didn't work out.
There's a bit too much smut and a minimum of respect for the genre in this family film.
Even as an advertisement for canisterapii, this amateurish piece would not have passed.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to constant abuse from the likes of you.
There is a difference between offering and coercing, here you can see how well you understand it, but that's only because you've never tried it.
The decision is always with the customer, if he doesn't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you had listened to that kid, you might have changed your mind.
It's work like any other, in this case a side job.
The near east is experiencing unusually dry months.
Winter is the only season of the year when it rains.
"Almost complete absence of rainfall during November, as we have recorded at some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service confirms.
For example, the village of Kfar Giladi in northern Israel reports only six percent of its long-term rainfall average for November.
The two-day rainfall this week was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It hasn't rained for a long time.
It's also the right Christmas present, said Wasim Askar, a resident of Nazareth.
Rain in Israel comes almost exclusively in the winter months, is sudden and irregular.
The forests are dependent on the winter rains.
Without them, they dry out and are prone to fires.
It's not just about forests, but also about water resources and irrigation for farmers.
The largest freshwater source in Israel, Lake Galilee, has this spring been filled to the brim thanks to three consecutive rainy winters.
Since then, the level has been falling.
Water managers have been warning of the drought for years.
"It is expected that rainfall will decrease due to global warming and climate change in this area," said Uri Schor, head of the Israeli Water Authority, in 2018.
Israel can help with technologies such as desalination or wastewater recycling.
The poorer countries, such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan, are worse off.
In the streets of the Jordanian capital, Amman, more and more cisterns are appearing.
Water and private wells are drying up.
"This year, orders have increased by 70-80 percent compared to the previous two years," Imád Sulejman, a driver of a tanker truck, said in September.
Clashes broke out between farmers and security forces in the Iranian city of Isfahan.
The reason for the protests was the drought.
The course of the local river was completely dry.
The region has had the driest November in many years.
Israel is preparing a military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks did not bring "any progress" and that he had informed Washington about preparations for an attack on Iran's nuclear facilities.
Defense Minister Benny Gantz announced on Saturday that he had ordered the Israeli army to prepare for a military strike against Iran, according to Jonathan Lis.
Gantz, who lives in the United States, is trying to convince Americans to escalate their pressure on Iran, but also informed Washington of military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said that nuclear talks in Vienna have "not brought any progress" and that the world powers "understand that Iran is playing with them."
About three years ago, I had the same thing happen to me.
I liked her a bit and grilled her during the interview to find out what she really wanted from me.
Eventually, I discovered that my suspicions about the pyramid were justified.
Because I really don't like these underpants, I gave her a little push with doubts and questions, and in the end, I thanked her and left.
Feel free to tell me I'm stupid, but pyramids are pyramids and financial advisors are financial advisors.
Skiers went to the mountains over the weekend, waiting for enough snow and good weather
Mountain resorts in the Czech Republic have seen the first major surge of interest in skiing this weekend.
After a heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no longer any need for snow and some ski resorts have started operations.
The train driver was not deterred by the obligation to show a COVID certificate at the station.
While ski rental companies are not complaining about the lack of customers, some ski equipment rental companies are reporting weaker demand for their services than before the epidemic.
Thousands of people ran in the cross-country races and on the ski slopes over the weekend in the Liberec region.
The weather has been kind to the skiers, with sunshine and good snow conditions.
"We are satisfied that the opening weekend really started from the Thursday evening when we had the first skiers on the slopes," said the director of the Ještěd Sports Complex, Jakub Hanuš.
Hundreds of people also headed to the Jeseníky for the first weekend of the new season.
For example, the Ski Arena Karlov or the centre in Branná in Šumperk were open.
The weekend attendance was very good, with an estimated 400 people on Saturday and Sunday.
The conditions are unfavourable.
Today the sun shone, it was minus three degrees, so it was perfect, praised the representative of the ski resort in Branná Rostislav Procházka.
Ski resort operators can only sell lift passes to people who are vaccinated or who have recovered from Covid-19 within a certain time frame.
People are ready for it and they are showing the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn sketch centre.
"We have only recorded incidents," he added.
Some ski rental and equipment shops are reporting lower demand than before the pandemic.
The interest in borrowing skis is fortunately high.
It's not like in previous years, but there are still plenty of customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Skiopava store in Opava.
More pressure is expected during the ski course period.
The manager of the Královéhradecká company Snowbear, David Šinták, also feels that due to COVID-19, there is not as much interest in renting ski equipment as there was before.
At that time, we were already almost on loan.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are about 50 percent, said Šinták to ČTK.
People, according to him, have become lazy and learned to sit at home.
On the other hand, the car rental company in the Novako area on Boží Dar has a high demand.
They started renting skis last week and now customers have to order them in advance.
"We're starting to rent bikes this weekend, but people have already been calling ahead, so we expect a lot of interest, just like last year," said Pavlína Nováková, the manager of the area.
According to her, the interest is comparable to the period before the epidemic, and it is also about the ski school.
If we want successful and wealthy people to stay in the country, they must have the opportunity to live a good life here as they would in a foreign country.
Socialist healthcare is certainly not the place to go if you want to see a dentist or specialist doctor.
The smart and savvy people who don't have any property in the country are leaving.
The owner of the company will not just leave the country.
But I completely agree with the rest.
If these people are not going to live well in the Czech Republic and if these people are not going to have a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they will not be able to live in the Czech Republic.
The emigration from Hungary began when one beautiful day Orbán won, he ruled for a year, and then the annual emigration rose by a few thousand.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic can find itself in such a position on a daily basis.
The next question is the elections.
When it gets crowded here, some traditional V4 lunatic can also win.
The young and educated will leave, but his supporters and the people whose property cannot fit into the plane will remain.
Heartbreaking photo!
Langmajer bled because of a bet on beer?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the film crew, led by Jiří Langmajer (55), was enjoying the tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury or is it just a cover-up for filming?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Petrina's disappearance is not at all like her behaviour and we are starting to worry about her," said Lucy O'Connor from the police department in the Lambeth area, where Srncová worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and basically wants to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman, who was dismissed from her job on Sunday, November 28, around 19:45, left work and headed home to the Camberwell area.
She was reportedly last seen about half an hour later in a bus.
Her disappearance was reported by one of her colleagues on December 3.
Srncová, according to British media, worked as a "nurse's assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' Hospital Trust.
"We are extremely concerned for our colleague Petra, who has been missing for a long time," a group of healthcare facilities tweeted.
"We are appealing to anyone who may have any information that could help locate her to contact police," the statement continued.
The public is also being called to cooperate by MP Harriet Harman, who spoke about the case at a press conference on Saturday.
"She has been missing for several days, she is only 32 years old, she is from the Czech Republic, her parents are obviously devastated," Labour politician said, holding a photograph of the woman distributed by the London police.
"I feel like we all have a really big responsibility to find her, because she was out of her home country, out of her family, and working here for our healthcare," Harman said.
Police have already detained one man in connection with the incident, who remains in custody.
However, the BBC news website says police have not released any information about his identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia is not capable of occupying Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (i.e. ca. 5 divisions).
I don't underestimate Ukraine either.
That is not "a lot," but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Notice that Ukraine is constantly repeating that the threat of invasion is exaggerated and that our entry is full of teeth.
I quoted above.
I don't know what he thinks Russia wants to do.
War is a sacred game and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
The comparison with the situation in 38 is so far off in so many ways that I don't even know where to start.
I can compare it to the First Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily:D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia annexed those ridiculous republics.
That is exactly what the "concentration" at the borders would correspond to.
That is, pacta sunt servanda...
New traffic regulations will come into effect in Prague from Sunday, affecting mainly suburban connections
Passengers in Prague's integrated transport (PID) are waiting for several changes, which mainly affect suburban connections.
New lines have been created, some have changed their route, and others have disappeared.
Mladoboleslavsko is now being integrated into the integrated system.
In the capital, the fast trains from České Budějovice stop at the Zahradní Město station on Sundays.
The S7 suburban train will run on the route from Beroun to Český Brod, passing through Prague's main railway station.
The recently opened station Praha-Zahradní Město will now be served by the R17 fast train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
PID will be expanded to other areas.
In addition, buses go to Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatná u Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
The buses will be integrated into the Mladoboleslav transport network, including lines with an extension into Liberec and Hradec Králové.
77 lines will be cancelled, 37 new ones will be introduced, and the operation of 12 existing ones will be improved.
The new bus line 405 will depart from Zličín in Prague and will go all the way to Žatec.
There is also a new direct connection between Prague and Kralovice u Rakovníka, which replaces the cancelled line S53.
They will be strengthened in the morning peak and on weekends a new express line number 404 will run from Prague to Rakovník.
The lines 400 and 410, which run to Liberec, have now been included in the PID system.
They depart from Střížkov metro station, not from Nádraží Holešovice station.
Line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubá and Česká Lípa to Nové Bor and selected trains continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The 410 supplementary line goes through Mělník, Dubá, Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné in Podještědí.
On the other hand, the operation of dozens of local tracks has been suspended or limited, including to Mochov, Dobříš and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Due to the modernization of the railway, long-term restrictions are in place on the Prague – Beroun, Prague – Lysá nad Labem and in the vicinity of Kolín.
Changes are also in store for passengers at other locations.
Buses are replacing some of the cancelled railway lines or extending the line 420 from Dobříš with a connection to Prague, where PID tickets can be used up to Milevsko.
The routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk were changed, and the routes of some buses on the border of Central Bohemia and Horovice in the Plzeň Region were also changed.
Healthy lunch/snack from the supermarket
Hi, I work classic 9-5 with a 30-minute break and my only option for food is to go to Billy or a bit further to Lidl.
Since I don't have any movement, after work I don't have the strength to exercise, so I have to eat as healthily and nutritiously as possible.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy and I always buy pizza dough, yogurt and an apple as quickly as possible.
Question: What healthy food would you recommend I buy in a supermarket without the need for thermal processing?
Not everyone is waiting for a metre of snow like you are, unfortunately.
And it's not about the trees you must see.
Only the tip of the tree can be hidden under the snow.
If it is damaged, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal infections.
I don't think it's the only reason why we're not allowed to drive outside the track, but it's one of them.
Dary's confession about her relationship with Nedvěd: I was not happy about this
The Czech showbiz pond is alive only because of the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedvěd.
They have been together since the summer, and the famous footballer even left his wife for the singer.
Dara now sent a lengthy message to her fans, explaining why she kept her love for them a secret for half a year.
"I can say that there is no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia who would not know that Dara caught a bear, pardon, Nedvěda," Dara Rolins, who is in love with the most successful Czech footballer, jokes.
But he didn't crush her, on the contrary.
Three days are the focus of attention, and although they are accustomed to the public interest, they do not enjoy it.
And it is here.
What we didn't have, but knew would happen, continued the singer.
I just don't know who is worse off.
If you don't care about it and jump on them, or if we, whose lives are ruined by it, care about it.
As if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether you are compatible with your husband or girlfriend, or whether you insisted on everyone knowing your complete list of former partners and being familiar with the list of your mistakes and errors.
That's what you want, it's annoying Daré.
The couple reunited in Italy, where Rollins was going for the preparations of her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has been working as vice president of the football club Juventus for a long time.
They have been telling the truth up until now, because they have been waiting for Nedvěd's divorce to be finalized.
Ivan and his wife have been separated for three years, but they are not officially divorced yet.
Thank you to those who are happy with us and wish us well.
We are just people, we have families, children, past and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
I love my new husband just as much as he loves me, and I stand by him just as he stands by me. In good times and bad, Rolins said.
Hi, everyone else has said most of the important things, I just want to confirm that the trains are super at the beginning, my classmates mostly met and became friends during the first semester or two, and then found part-time jobs together, which is the best option for me because you know who you'll be living with.
Flats usually don't stay on the market for very long, so you probably won't find much, but it's worth taking a look at the listings.
Otherwise, Cejl is not the only place to avoid, but also the surrounding area (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., that's a pretty bad address), and some parts of Žižkov are a bit of a ghetto.
Opposite Veveří quarter is very student-friendly, Královo pole and that way is great, but it's also close to most of VUT's faculties (I don't know exactly where you're going).
I have never been a renter, but I am a native of Brno, so I can perhaps help you with Brno as such, if you still need some information :)
But this is a completely "normal" way of thinking.
Because of what some doctors have decided to do in Poland, it's actually fine that the state doesn't fund some schools enough.
Either learn what they want and pay for it themselves, or go by the state and pay for it.
We cannot allow a private actor to control a piece of education just because a few crowns are added to the state contribution and thus they will be able to teach what they want in schools.
The statement, however, loses some of its weight when it is written by a person who, two days earlier, had expressed himself in the same way about the petition for a boycott of the totalitarian state:
So, the vote on whether someone should have an abortion is the same as the vote on whether a statue should stand in the town square?
I would consult with the person who hired you directly about this.
Otherwise, I have experienced that (and even long-term professionals) it either fits the eye or they write something like xxx *** or ... (according to the convention) and add a note that it is unreadable.
The truth is that in this case it is quite readable, so I would not recommend it.
Personally, I would deal with it in a note, depending on the program you are using.
If you want to be a good and studious student, you can look up some sign language databases and find the nearest one.
But because it looks like you're quoting from a book, I would suggest that the author or printer simply created their own unique mark that sits next to what is physically on the coin.
PS: Is it not more likely to be the OdryNska Empire (kingdom) than the OdryNska?
PSS: Someone has already made a mess of it here.
Click on the comment with ΦΙΛH
Politicians don't know what the "theme" of our presidency will be.
That's much worse than having a translator with you.
The idea that something would be approved because no one understood some text is funny.
All important approved documents are examined word by word, and some basic knowledge of English is not enough for that, it is a matter for lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in various institutions of the EU, English is more suitable for politicians for informal contacts, for establishing extra-standard relationships.
And with the English, it's quite interesting after Brexit.
I don't understand the hate for Cejl.
I have been working there for three years now and I am completely at ease.
How many times have I ridden from work at 10pm and never had a problem.
That it is a ghetto can only be said by someone who has not walked through it in their life.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno lives there, but the only thing they do is cross the road and park where they shouldn't :D it's not that I would be afraid to go out in the evening there.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the city centre, I'd be happy to go for it.
There are now plenty of flats that have been newly renovated or newly built.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and Gelemová as a nail in the plot!
With whom do you spend Christmas?
Most people lit the first candle on their Advent wreath on Sunday, but Felix Slováček did not.
I don't have an advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I've seen Dády's wreath, and Lucie definitely has one too, said the saxophonist, who confirmed Patrasová's words that she often visits her.
He visits, but he doesn't live in their house in Vinohrady, where Dáda stayed alone after his departure.
The Slovák still doesn't know where he will be on St. Nicholas's Eve.
Recently, we met with Anička, Felix and both grandchildren.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we still talked about something, so Christmas didn't happen.
I really don't know where I'll be.
I buy gifts all the time, and I'm sure I'll buy something for Dad and Lucie, maybe a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who himself came to the christening of the music video for the Richman club.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
I always find someone to have fun with, says Slováček, who was happy to meet the wife of Ludvík Sobota, Adéla, or singer Kamila Nývlt.
And he was very clear about it.
And we are an island, so we can afford not to have soldiers and weapons?
I doubt anyone would defend us and our location is so strategically important that the aggressor would have to be a complete idiot to hold it.
And I don't understand why that would be a bad argument, so could you explain that to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be deployed in hospitals in a crisis.
There are few police officers and they can't afford to do it, just like firefighters and nowhere else is there such a high percentage of health-trained people at such a level.
And that our army is capable of defending Ostrava is a head above the previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for a long time.
Record drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies, the countryside should not be just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is going through the worst drought in recent years.
According to scientists, water levels have decreased in mountainous and sub-mountainous areas, and smaller amounts of precipitation have been recorded in places where water shortages have not yet occurred.
The drought that is affecting large parts of central Europe is caused by climate change.
However, the impacts are compounded by the way we manage the land.
What should we prepare in connection with the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
I'll just hold on to my skates on the ice, I know how to play hockey, and that tactic (which I tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) is a total joke.
And if you're a hockey team called "the bears of Russia" or "the lamas of China" then losing by two goals even if you don't have to win the game is different from losing by two goals even if you have to win the game.
But as I listen to the Czech commentators who criticize everything, I wonder what the referees are seeing that they don't see, whether it's male or female hockey. It's all very strange, but that's how it is with everything, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
The controversy is everywhere.
And I think if it was the other way around, it would be like always, and that the Czech Republic and Russia have lost more often than they have won, it would be a classic "they lost" vs "we won".
Coronavirus: Number of cases in Russia exceeds 10 million
On Saturday, 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily cases.
5766 people have been hospitalized.
A total of 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, and another 74.
There were 1967 confirmed cases in the Czech Republic in the last 14 days, and 871 in the last week.
The number of cases in Russia on Sunday exceeded 10 million.
In the last 24 hours, 29,929 new cases have been registered.
It is the lowest daily figure since October 13.
The total number of registered cases in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest since the end of October.
Britain is facing an "inevitable" wave of infections caused by the Omicron variant, said Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, on television on Sunday.
New quarantine measures will be needed.
People infected with the Omicron variant are already being hospitalised in the UK, and Hopkins expects the number to rise.
So far, no one has died from omicron, but hospitalizations are occurring about 14 days after infection and deaths are occurring about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson may have broken the law by holding a Christmas party last year when a lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One minister in Johnson's government defended the quiz as "virtually" taking place on a computer.
But they were joined by a group of staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
Pressure is mounting on the UK to remove Johnson from the premiership.
During last December, when a strict lockdown was introduced in London and Christmas parties were banned, Johnson's ministers held numerous parties despite the lockdown.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government have been making jokes about them:
Paul Brand, editor of ITV's commercial television channel for Britain: Two years ago, Boris Johnson won a landslide victory in the general election.
Today, the Conservative Party is talking about removing him from the post of Prime Minister.
Remarkable how quickly the events unfolded.
Do you want to turn and save your skin?
Hungarians are waiting for the spring elections, which could end Viktor Orbán's twelve-year rule.
They will be major European elections.
How fair can they be?
They will not be fair.
They probably won't be free either, because they weren't even free in the last two elections under Orbán.
His party, Fidesz, controls the media, changes the boundaries of electoral districts to benefit from it, and does other smaller or larger tricks.
The latest sounds like everyone can choose where they want to go.
This would allow Fidesz to swing voters from decided districts to those where the outcome is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So I'll just reiterate that it won't be at all.
Do you think it will be the same as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is very different.
It used to be about whether Fidesz would win, but how many and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now there is a real chance that the united opposition will get more votes and seats.
This is a big surprise for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they play harder to keep power?
Yes, we have some indications that they are ready to go beyond what they have done so far.
Recently, an audio recording of the president of parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, Laszlo Kovacs, was leaked to the independent media, where he explains to the heads of secret services that the opposition poses a threat to national security.
Those are the hints of a new approach you are talking about?
Yes, that is one of the new features.
It all starts with language.
I was bit quite often, the last time at 14, my mother doesn't have much patience, neither do I, my grandmother has a long fuse, but then it blows up (only in relation to me).
I was also very temperamental and I was screaming like a little devil, to the point where I was lying on the ground in agony and they took me under the shower twice to calm me down.
Sometimes they would lecture me, sometimes it was more like they didn't know.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things by force, as I'm quite impulsive, and now I want to do at least something, and as a younger person, I have to make my parents happy even if it means (I don't get enough power through the handle), so I never do anything extreme, but I always have that urge.
I'm not able to determine to what extent this is my impulsiveness, but education certainly has its part to play in it.
I'm afraid I'll lose my patience with my children and deal with it the same way.
I think hitting children is just wrong and that my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not in that moment when it wasn't "educational," but out of frustration, on the other hand, every parent makes mistakes with their kids, and it's not possible to spoil them completely, so I don't hold it against them.
It doesn't bother me, I don't understand why he should feel ashamed.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call the Kundas those who make laws in such quality.
Otherwise, I'd be interested to know if you're worried about losing income?
It is possible to count on the fact that people want and buy the product and you will have enough money to pay the mortgage?
Kočner's extravagant world.
Where will Slovakia move the process of investigating the murder of journalist Kuciak?
The main trial in the case of the quadruple murder of Jan Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová begins in Slovakia.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner changed Slovakia.
The civil society group exposed the practices of the accused businessman Marian Kočner and his connections to the top of Slovak politics and justice.
What will the fundamental change mean for Slovakia?
This is a huge topic for journalists to cover.
How is it possible that this petition had a lot more media attention than the petition of the deans of all medical faculties, which came out the next day, two days later?
Well, they let themselves go and the company let them go.
They were talking about COVID-19 on Czech television even before half a year.
Another government ends and the law on the involvement of municipalities in the selection of landfills nowhere to be found
The minister's proposal needs to be fundamentally revised
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is on the verge of collapse, and the law that was supposed to ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens in the selection and licensing of a deep repository for high-level radioactive waste is still not in place.
The government's legislative council has suspended the debate on the proposal, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade submitted to the government after years of deliberations.
However, its content is in serious conflict not only with the affected municipalities, which are part of the Platform Against Deep Storage, but also with the Czech Union of Municipalities and Towns.
The self-government is expected to significantly strengthen its decision-making capabilities on waste disposal, which has been promised since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began and which is also required by the Czech atomic law and the European directive.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in line with its coalition agreement in cooperation with municipalities.
The proposed law by Minister Karel Havlíček, which is available to the Platform, is criticized by municipalities in particular: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process for selecting a location for a landfill is insufficient and cannot ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the municipalities or the public can influence whether the process will take place in a particular location.
This can be achieved by requiring the Waste Management Authority to request the consent of the affected municipalities before starting a specific proceeding.
The proposed agenda item almost completely ignores the involvement of the public and makes the citizens of the municipalities practically just statistics in the decision-making process.
The proposal lacks a system setting for compensation for municipalities for the entire search and selection process for a disposal site, its authorization and operation.
Municipal representatives do not have many options when it comes to defending the interests of their citizens when looking for a place to store waste.
Only in certain licensing decisions can comments or appeals be made, but the decision is made by the authority or the minister in whose interest the licence is to be issued.
Any appeal has no effect on the execution of exploratory or construction works.
The joint decision-making that the Platform is calling for is a principle that is commonly used in many democratic countries and certainly in those that have made progress in waste storage, such as Sweden and Finland.
The drafting of the law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external law firms to draft legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which SÚRAO has concluded and which is based on contracts with lawyer Jan Zemánek.
The total sum for these works according to the register of contracts is almost 4 million Czech crowns.
Antonín Seknička, the deputy mayor of the village of Cejle from the Hrádek locality and the spokesman for the Platform against the deep geological repository, said: "After the ministers of industry, who passed the responsibility for finding a deep geological repository for highly radioactive waste onto their successors, we are waiting for a more significant change from the new government."
We also offer a helping hand.
We also thank the Association of Municipalities and Towns for their support, which views the problem of insufficient rights of municipalities for such a fundamental building in the same way as the directly affected municipalities in selected locations.
The Deep Geological Repository Platform brings together 51 members (35 municipalities and cities and 16 associations) with the aim of changing the state's approach to dealing with spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to deep geological repositories.
The platform further advocates that decisions on the selection of a location for possible storage should be subject to the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman's (69) fear of getting out of shape forced him to weigh 90 kg.
Although he had not needed to change anything in his lifestyle for a long time, the doctors eventually scared him.
He told him that if he didn't stop, he would die.
And that was it.
Goodman has gradually lost 90 kilograms, which is half of his original weight of 180 kg, reports The Sun.
He celebrated his new character at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers in Los Angeles.
The person from the sitcom Roseanne is completely different!
John liked to joke that his friends and family had begged him to lose weight because his big body was causing furniture to break.
"I've got everything in my mouth," the actor said in a 2018 interview with AARP.
This time I wanted to do it slowly.
To move, to exercise.
I'm getting to the age where I can't afford to sit still, said ABC's Goodman, whose transformation is amazing.
It also depends on the boss you're talking about and what you mean by the word "boss."
If it's a text on a platform that expects readers from a gaming environment, I wouldn't translate it.
If it were a formal text, perhaps I would look for a way to describe or explain it better.
There are many different types of bosses.
For example, a game like Dark Souls has several bosses, and yes, a boss is something like a lord or ruler of a certain level, and then there is the final boss...
Many games have hidden bosses (super bosses, hidden bosses), who are not necessary to defeat in order to complete the game or level, but are often much stronger than the standard boss.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but you don't fight them directly (Tentacle, Gargantua), and what would you call that?
And then they are mini bosses.
It's not even worth trying to translate the boss into Czech or any other language, because it doesn't solve the problem (interesting is the Catalan language, which translates the boss as the final opponent).
It's basically a story or game that's generally important, computer-controlled, stronger than all previous opponents, and monitoring the completion of some level or task.
The whole world is looking for the lost Peter from London.
The Czech police were also involved.
The British police have been searching for Petr Srncová since December 3.
The Czech police have also joined the search.
The 32-year-old woman from Uherské Hradiště has been missing since December 7.
At the same time, the British police are also helped by Interpol.
Her colleagues last saw Petra Srncová on November 28.
British police have been searching for her since December 3.
Interpol issued a so-called yellow notice for her.
After Peter, the whole world is looking.
"The Czech police cooperate closely with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We share information on the case," she added.
The search for Peter has also been announced on the police website.
According to him, she is 168 centimetres tall, is skinny and has brown eyes and long, straight hair of the same colour.
It should come from Uherskohradišťsko.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her disappearance, as such a disappearance is very unusual for her
Harriet Harman, the MP for Camberwell and Peckham, has also joined the search for Peter.
She was involved in putting up posters with Petra's face on them.
"We have huge concerns about her," she said at a press conference on Saturday.
In connection with the disappearance, British police have already arrested one suspect.
However, it is not clear who he was talking about and what he had in common with Petra.
Before Christmas, Czechia is terrorizing Agent Tesla.
While data in October showed a slight decline in attack campaigns, the previous month saw an increase in attacks with the approaching end of the year.
We have recorded a major campaign in connection with Agent Tesla on November 18.
The attacks are aimed at the Czech Republic.
The attackers' strategy remains the same for now.
The infected attachment in the email will catch the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
While last month's dangerous word in the name was "invoice," this time it was marked as "Copy of repair invoice for 11.2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
Spyware contains functions that scan Internet browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook email clients, Mozilla Thunderbird or Yandex.
The malicious code actively looks for stored login credentials and then sends them to the attackers.
The last strong campaign took place in the Czech Republic at the end of August and beginning of September, with the approaching holidays and the end of the year, the activity of the attackers is again on the rise.
In November, the spyware Formbook remained active.
Unlike Agent Tesla, the attackers in this case did not focus specifically on the Czech Republic and security specialists in November captured more of a global campaign.
Compared to the October figures, Formbook has slightly weakened in November, but it is still well above one-fifth of all detections.
The attacks continued throughout the month with increased activity on the 3rd, 10th and 15th of November.
The formbook usually contained an attachment with the suffix .exe, which carried the name REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
However, the name of the bill continues to appear.
The Czech version of the appendix can be much more dangerous for a Czech user.
Security analysts have noted a significant drop and a lack of activity in the Fareit program, which accounted for 1.6 percent of attacks and had no major campaign in the Czech Republic in recent months.
Today's smart-phone-using hypochondriac who doesn't need oxygen because oxygen is for vaccinated idiots.
The guide through Prague was bigger than the media reports.
According to the footage of the parade along the embankment and according to my experience as a demonstrator, I estimate the number of people to be around 10,000.
People filled the quay and the bridge and the opposite quayside road.
That means a lot of people.
The march of around 4,000 demonstrators is joined by an unprecedented number of bystanders.
I claim that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
The persistent dissatisfaction of several large groups or strata of the population led to the emergence of a common language.
Only the antivaxxers, anti-maskers and co. could fill such a large crowd and pay for it.
The Chcípl pes movement is gaining popularity, reminding me of Million Moments for Democracy.
Sometimes I have the impression that they rent the same podium and equipment.
It is hard to say what movement could be created from this discontent, as it depends not only on the supply of money, but also on whether the three-dose vaccine from Pfizer becomes a four-dose or more.
It won't be a left-wing or centrist movement, that's for sure.
A three-dose vaccine will almost certainly become a four-dose vaccine, because it is clear that we will have to get boosted every six months.
I am very glad that the vaccines saved us.
A genius action of scientists, which humanity deserves to be proud of.
The end of the road for Bulgaria's new prime minister announcing change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has tasked the formation of a new government with Kirill Petkov from the anti-corruption movement Continuing the Change, which won the November elections.
It has managed to put together a broad coalition that should take office in a few days.
The political crisis in the country has been ongoing since April, when the previous government lost the elections under the weight of anti-corruption protests.
The winning parties that have pledged to fight corruption and abuse of power were unable to agree, so there were two more early elections.
What do cats do when nobody's watching?
From the "secret" footage, a global hit is born.
Concerns have grown in Britain over the fate of the 32-year-old Czech woman, who has been missing for several days.
Petra Srncová was last seen two weeks ago when she was on her way home from work in the south of the British capital.
In addition to the police, the woman's former employer and the MP for part of London where she lived have also been contacted.
"Petrina's disappearance is not at all like her behaviour and we are starting to worry about her," said Lucy O'Connor from the police department in the Lambeth area, where Srncová worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and they just want to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman was reported missing from her Camberwell home on Sunday, November 28, around 7:45pm.
She was reportedly last seen about half an hour later in a bus.
Her disappearance was reported by one of her colleagues on December 3.
Srncová, according to British media, worked as a "nurse's assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' Hospital Trust.
"We are deeply concerned for our colleague Petra, who has been missing for days," a group of healthcare facilities tweeted.
"We are appealing to anyone who may have any information that could help locate her to contact police," the statement continued.
An anonymous person has reported to Šumperk amateur painter Zdeňka Dvořáková Kocourková (also a regional pirate councillor) that she is violating copyright laws with her paintings.
However, the court ruled that Krtečka's paintings in the Šumperk rooms do not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, a hole in the road in the shape of a canal without a lid.
It was life.
The magistrate referred the complaints to the RSD, which owns the road, and because it did not respond, the hole continued to grow.
In the end, the authorities clarified responsibilities and ownership and after a month, the RSD "intensively dealt with the situation."
